review_content
Believe me I wanted to love this movie. I grew up on the Justice League. I love the Justice League. This movie was exactly how I would not do it. Let me begin my review.CGI 聳 I also love CGI. I think we've made some great movie magic with CGI. Here the CGI was so distractingly bad I could not stop wondering how could they do such a bad job with such a huge budget? Let me start with the bad guy 聳 Steppenwolf. The Character looked like it was lifted right out of a video game. He did not look real at all. Honestly this movie looked like they took the Human Actors (plus half and half Superman 聳 I'll get to that) and plopped them right into a video game. It looked like these actors all stood in a sound stage and punch and kicked and jumped. The CGI was so bad the movie lost all sense of realism. It did not help that the directors of this movie has no idea how to put more than 2 characters in a fight scene at any time. Again this took away from the realism also 聳 how do our super heroes fight the alien villains in the middle of a city and not one bystander is in any of the scenes. The world is being destroyed but no one is watching or no one tries running away. Its funny because at one point in the middle of a big fight scene Lois Lane just shows up but no one else including Police or Military does. I sat there in total shock thinking how could some one make such garbage fake scenes. But the most laughable part of the CGI has to do with Superman. I sat there looking at him the whole movie thinking what is wrong with him, he looks off. So afterwards I read that Henry Cavill was filming another movie at the same time as this and in that other movie he was required to have a mustache and beard. So they filmed all his scenes with a beard and CGI'd them out. And it was a terrible job of CGIing the beard out. His face looked off and at points I wondered if it was even Henry playing Superman or a look alike. It was bad and for a movie this BIG it should have been so much better.As for the other Heroes here are my thoughts, but first let me comment on something that bothers a lot of Justice League fans, why did they take all the color and make these movies so dark. This is a big factor on why Marvel makes much better movies than DC. Look at the costume of Batman (all black), Wonder Women/Aquaman/Superman colors dimmed to the point of their outfits are basically black also. Flash looked OK.Batman 聳 Ben Affleck seems to be sleep walking through this movie. He is boring boring boring. Enough said about him.Aquaman 聳 was Aquaman even in this movie? I recall Batman, Superman, Wonder Woman, Flash, and some cyborg guy, but was Aquaman in this movie? Cuz there was some dude that says Bro and Bruh with long hair and a bunch of tattoos. Jason Momoa was not Aquaman. Not only in persona/appearance, but Aquaman did not use his Aqua skills the entire movie. It was like the director has no idea how to pull this off. He was in the water at the beginning a little when he wasn't drinking his big beer and acting all tough like a pirate/surfer at some pub. But not once did Aquaman used his Aqua skills in this movie. In fact, both of the Justice League fight scenes there was no water around. I am not sure what was worse the CGI or Aquaman.Flash 聳 I hear some liked him but I could help wondering was Woody Allen not available at the time of filming? Because the guy who played Flash was trying to be Woody Allen the whole movie. Flash was supposedly the funny one 聳 either him or Aquaman, but neither made me laugh once.Cyborg 聳 Actually Cybrog made me laugh when Steppenwolf pulled off his arms and legs. I laughed out loud at that one. Actually I never knew who cyborg was but from watching this movie he was a fish out of water just like Aquaman. Cyborg apparently deals with Cyber-crimes. Only problem Steppenwolf is from the past and doesn't use computers so Cyborg was useless.Wonder Woman 聳 The best thing about this movie. No complaints here other than her black Wonder Woman outfit.Superman 聳 touched on him earlier. I like Henry Cavill and like his Superman portrayal. He wasn't the best here as he wasn't give much to do. He had a couple heart felt scenes (with Lois and his Mom) and CGI withstanding he looks OK for Superman although he looked small in this one.As for the plot, bad guy from the past wants to destroy the world. Typical but not executed very well.After seeing this movie I could not help but wish they would blow this whole thing up and start over. They hint of the next movie and I just thought 聳 too bad. DC needs to look at what Marvel is doing and copy, please copy. I also saw Thor's movie and that movie was 1000 times better. Take my advice and see Thor instead. A bad movie like this does not deserve to make the kind of movie it is making.
I grew up watching the Justice League animated series and I enjoyed every DCEU movie so far, so I was really excited to finally see these heroes together for the first time on the big screen. Unfortunately, the movie was a letdown. It's not bad by any means, but it was not as epic as it should have been. Here are my pros and cons:Pros: + The acting is really good + Great chemistry between the League+ Some good action scenes (Amazons vs Steppenwolf is one the best moments of the movie), even though the movie lacks any memorable action like the ones in Man of Steel, BvS or Wonder Woman + Superman is finally done right+ There are some fun scenes+ The Flash is great and you can't ignore Wonder Woman every time she's on screen. Aquaman and Cyborg were fine. Batman was fine as well (Ben Affleck didn't look very interested in this movie as he was in BvS) + The post credit scenes are greatCons: The plot is weak (bad guy wants to destroy the world, just like The Avengers, Avengers: Age of Ultron, Man of Steel, Suicide Squad, X-Men: Apocalypse, etc). You can tell how it all ends, everything is very predictable The villain is really awful. I didn't fear him for a second Not a lot of surprises The VFX is a letdown compared to Man of Steel and BvS (Superman's erased mustache is really distracting)Very little character development You can tell basically all the scenes added in reshootsThe jokes didn't work. Most of them are silly, not funny Gal Gadot's acting is not very good in some scenes. It looks like she is as good as her directors. With Patty Jenkins (Wonder Woman's director), she was great. Here with Zack Snyder/Joss Whedon, not so much Some of the dialogues are really bad (like the ones with Mera and Aquaman). Half of them are pure exposition The movie lacks stakes or any sense of danger The final battle is really generic The movie is never really exciting. It's almost exciting, but never really really exciting.It's not a bad movie, but it's not great either. Unfortunately Justice League is just okay. You won't remember it in a year. I didn't love the movie, but based on the last post credit scene, I'm excited for where this universe can go next.
So the highly anticipated DCU ensemble movie is finally here.I've always been a fan, got the comics and have known the characters since childhood and I wanted to like this movie. Unlike the Avengers sequels which I expected to be mere shadows of the first installment but weren't, I truly expected to enjoy this newest adventure but didn't.More accurately, I couldn't. Perhaps it is still a bit much to relate to yet another Batman and Superman. Or perhaps it was the stilted acting or the corny lines. Maybe it was because the scriptwriters were so busy trying to weave multiple characters together that they forgot to give the villain, Steppenwulf, a personality. The obvious CGI gave us a paper-mache anti-hero who was not interesting enough to take seriously, let alone dislike. In comparison, the android Ultron was more convincing.I also had difficulty caring if Superman lived or died and I doubt Lois or Ma Kent felt any different in their reunion scenes. He may have the body and the looks but let's face it, Henry will never score high on charisma or presence. Then there is the Flash who like Marvel's Spiderman was reduced to being an juvenile crackhead whose every scene only enhanced his awkward cringe-worthiness. As for Affleck's stint as the bat, I am amazed he can walk, let alone fight in his sumo suit. Come on DC, less is more? He's supposed to be a genius, one who doesn't need to be padded like an Abrams tank.Put these caricatures together with Gadot, Momoa and Fisher and you have 2 hours of big budget, underwhelming action. Hence, zero sum, the exciting is canceled out by the mediocre.Am I being harsh? Well just ask yourself if you would pay to see a standalone Batman, Superman or Flash movie? We already know how badly the Man of Steel tanked on his solo outing so no need to go there again. Batman and Superman together didn't fare better.Go see this and judge for yourselves. The JLA legacy deserves that much but I'd sooner watch another Diana Prince movie than a Justice League sequel. With this ensemble and production team, less would definitely have been more.
Zack Snyder's "Justice League" is nothing more than another poorly made movie in a franchise that's practically been dead since its second film. While not as horrible, "Justice League" still is not good. The most redeeming factor of the film is some of its characters, but that isn't enough to pull this series out of the hole its in. On the plus side, Gal Gadot's Wonder Woman still shines, even after her wonderfully made standalone film, and may be the best character in the film. Jason Mamoa's Aquaman is a lot of fun, with great humor to go alongside him. Ray Fisher's Cyborg is also an interesting and fun character, being equally as good as Momoa, maybe even slightly better. Unfortunately, Ezra Miller's Flash does not blend with the darkness of every other character, some saying that is the point, but he is almost too far gone to blend in any way. Then, Affleck's Batman is a dry, dull, ill-humored, useless character, and Henry Cavill still broods too much to be fun, and is a somewhat useless addition. The villain of the film is nonthreatening, boring, and plot less, and could be the worst part of the entire film, next to the clich茅 and boring plot that has been seen in every Avenger's movie to this day, and believe me, I hate having to make that comparison. "Justice League is moderately fun, but still can't redeem this helpless series.
The film was okay. Definitely not bad. How I wish Warner Brothers experimented with more standalone films before they finally got to Justice League. As a big DC fan, I was a bit let down. 2hours was definitely not enough to put this film's story across. There were great plot points but everything just seemed to go by too quickly. Henry Cavill's CGI upper lip was very distracting, and his superman- even though I really liked him- but he was just too powerful for Steppenwolf, or maybe Steppenwolf was the one who was too weak for the story they were going for. For someone who wanted to destroy the world, I think he wasn't menacing enough. Ray Fisher was great as Cyborg, I liked Gal Gaddot as Wonder Woman, Mamoa as Aquaman, and even Miller as the flash. But I didn't like how the flash runs in this movie....his legs move in a weird way. Batfleck owned his role obviously. There were great moments in the film, especially when Superman returns and meets the team for the first time. Loved his reunion with Louise and his Mom, and I'm really looking forward to where this universe will go.The first credits scene didn't do anything for me (I thought they'd both run instead of Superman flying).Many scenes in the trailer were not in the movie, and I feel like there was more to this film than what we get to see. The CGI also needed more polishing. It's definitely getting a lot more hate than it deserves. I really feel sorry for Zack Snyder...I know the backlash he gets from people will definitely affect his confidence as a director, especially for DCEU films and his vision of it. I give this movie a 6.5/10. An argument can be made for 7/10. Anyone giving this movie more than a 7/10 is not being completely honest with themselves. I really looked forward to this movie, but the theatrical release hasn't done much for me. Definitely a forgettable movie.
Justice League felt like going through a list of specifications with no identity whatsoever. It's not a bad movie per se, it's just extremely dull. Of course there's nothing new in the photo department but that's to be expected, it's kind of an identity for the whole DCEU. I don't like it but hey, that's an artistic choice I won't criticize here, at least it's coherent. But some flaws are more crippling than that. Every single characterization was a bit off and some of them felt like they were forced, especially Barry Allen. Still, the actors do the best they can with the material so it's not unbearable. Every situation (and even the chain of events) is so predictable (clich茅 even) that it gets you out of the movie. This level of "nothing new" is damaging to the story as it stops you from caring about anything. And it seems like the producers knew this cause they threw in the mandatory helpless family so that you could sense the danger a bit more. After all, it's just the end of the world, how could you care if there was no kid in immediate danger ? Oh wait... Still, even that falls flat as their scenes (and they're not the only ones) are filled with incoherent behaviors that were put there just so that the plot can go forward. I attended a screening where the only bursts of joy (or emotions at all) occurred when a new character appeared. Kind of a "fanboy effect" that fills you with hope at the sight of one of your beloved comics characters. But the rest of the time, everyone was quite bored and numerous sighs were heard. In a sense, it reassured me as I understood I was not the only one who was disappointed in the movie.*****The following paragraph might contain a minor SPOILER (depending on what you consider a spoiler)***** Plus, something else bothered me. But I know everyone won't agree on this one cause it's kind of a speculation. All the points above still stand even if I'm wrong about it. So here it is : Justice League felt like it was a failed attempt to adapt the Avengers in the DCEU. And I'm not talking about the strangely similar theme. Nor am I referring to the tension inside the team before they reconcile that felt like a watered-down version of what we saw in the 2012 movie by Whedon. But the characters are bent so that they match their Marvel counterparts. The Flash takes the place of the slightly weaker and wisecracking Hawkeye, Aquaman clearly corresponds to Thor with his royal and out-of-place persona, Wonder Woman goes through the same soldier- leader dilemma as Cap did and even Batman is slightly changed so that he's closer to Tony Stark (making decisions that make absolutely no sense for the world's best detective that we all know and love). That's a shame cause DC characters are interesting and have a lot more to offer than a mere copy. *****END OF POSSIBLE SPOILER*****As of 11/16/2017, this movie has an 8.1 score here on IMDb. Now I'm not a hater and won't say it's the worst movie in history but more than 8 ? Seriously ? It barely does the job so it's a 5 out of 10 for me.
In short:&gt;Many instances where the CGI and green screens are painfully obvious and stick out like a sore thumb.&gt;The editing is extremely rushed and abrupt in parts, with super important events such as Steppenwolf stealing the 3rd mother box being mentioned in cringey and obvious exposition by wonder woman, before cutting to a random event halfway around the world.&gt;The fight scenes in this film are extraordinarily underwhelming. In almost all the fights, barely any of the characters use their powers, with aqua man simply punching and getting thrown away, wonder woman using her sword instead of her OP abilities shown in her standalone movie, and cyborg literally doing nothing except putting his hands inside a glowing box. The end fight was extremely boring and anticlimactic, with the tension immediately disappearing when superman shows up and completely shuts down steppenwolf.&gt; The villain himself, Steppenwolf, is one of the worst parts of this film. He literally has only one power/ability, which is swinging his pathetic axe around. He is an all CGI uninspired and forgettable villain who isn't menacing in the least. The fight he puts up in the end is disgraceful, with him swinging his axe around a bit then getting completely trashed by superman.Probably in the minority here, but BVS for me was a 7/10, and this is a 5/10.
As we all know, Zack Snyder (BvS) has a very different vision of superhero movies than Joss Whedon (Avengers). This movie felt like a mish-mash of both incompatible styles. Scenes just happen without any connectivity, the plot is so generic it could have been written by a 5-year old. The attempt by WB Studios to Marvel-ise the movie by bringing in Joss Whedon and shoe-horning in comedy elements is nauseating. Yes, Flash has his comedic moments, but they feel very out of place. Superman's jokes are just out of character for what has been established. This should not please BvS and Man of Steel fans, nor should it please Marvel fans who are more into character chops and comedy. What we have is a very unfocused movie with such an uninteresting villain that I felt like they just dragged and dropped him from a Mortal Kombat cutscene. Whatever they were trying to establish with Cyborg's struggle as a half-man half-machine falls way flat, so does Wonder Woman's attempt at being an anchor for the morality of the team. Batman just mopes around and Flash just goofs around. Jason Momoa was a standout, but that's the point - not enough screen time is devoted to any of these characters for us to like them. There are no character arcs. There are certainly some good set pieces in the movie - the Amazon fight was good, so was the final fight scene, although it was very obvious they color-corrected much of it to look at least visible to the naked eye and for that I am thankful to Mr. Whedon. The stand-out scene for me was when Superman wakes up - Superman's fight with the team (although contrived in response to the success of Civil War) was interesting and I perked up for a moment, only to be undercut by Steppenwolf going "YOINK! Stole your BOX" and Superman returning to Smallville for the highly predictable recuperation scene with a sub-par Lois Lane performance and his mother (MARTHA!). Honestly, they missed a lot of great potential conflict with that subplot. All-in-all, I am surprised by how much everybody seems to be liking movie. I can only attribute that to the die-hard DC fanboyism and the vocal immature majority of the internet. I just want to know what the comic book fans think of this movie. So many great stories involving the Justice League (can someone please show Chris Terrio and his WB overlords the Timmverse JLA series?) This movie falls flat on its face into sub-par cheese cartoonish territory with the rushed team-up plot line and no focus of character chemistry. This is exactly what you would expect from a Zack Snyder helmed WB-DC product which Joss Whedon was hired cleaned up. Kudos to Joss Whedon for adding/modifying scenes that made the movie at least slightly watchable, but I would have loved to have seen a Justice League movie totally helmed by Joss Whedon, or even one which truly represented Zack Snyder's vision (however bad it may be). A 50-50 product just made it schlock-central, a betrayal to all involved in the creative process and insulting to the viewers.
Hey, don't go with high expectations, the movie is far away from epic, but it's pretty fine and funny, I enjoyed a lot of stuff, the characters are awesome! Even Steppenwolf isn't the lame they said, he is just not memorable, he's OK, a generic villain who delivers what everyone should expect (come on, it's Steppenwolf, why would you guys expect a mind blower villain here?) The plot is simple and works. The only fatal flaw for a huge fan of DC is the return of Superman, damn, that's was sooo weird :/ And Zimmer would be so much better than Danny was, buuut there's nothing we can do about it now, at least it's nostalgic.
The long anticipated "Justice League" has finally arrived finally combining the biggest stars of the DC universe into one film. The proposed film has faced many obstacles on the way to the big screen ranging from script issues, massive reshoots and a change of Director for said reshoots due to a family tragedy that Director Zack Snyder suffered.The film follows Batman (Ben Affleck) and Wonder Woman (Gal Godot), as they look to assemble a team of other gifted individuals to help fight off a pending invasion. The death of Superman has left a void on the Earth, and this has paved the way for an ancient evil to return as he attempts to conquer the planet after he collects the three needed artifacts that his plan requires.In a race against time, Batman and Wonder Woman recruit Aquaman (Jason Momoa), The Flash (Ezra Miller), and Cyborg (Ray Fisher), to battle to save the planet. Naturally they battle amongst themselves as well as their massing enemies but ultimately decide on a dangerous plan that can tip the odds in their favor and save the day.The action in the film is good but it often plays out like a video game. With so many blatantly obvious CGI backgrounds, the movie looked like a video game. There were numerous scenes that looked like they were lifted from Injustice and Injustice 2 that I muse d to myself that someone must have used their Power Up for the shot. Affleck and Gadot are good and work well with one another, but there are some serious casting issues with the film. The biggest for me was Ezra Miller as The Flash. I did not like his effeminate, nerdy, socially awkward, and neurotic and at times cowardly take on the character. This is not the Barry Allen I grew up reading in comics or the one that has been portrayed twice in a much better fashion on television. His comic relief status grew old fast and his character really offered little to the film.It has been well-documented that Joss Whedon not only handled the rewrites for the film but took over directing duties to complete the film. You can see elements of his humor scattered throughout and the film does move along at a steady pace without dragging.The biggest issue is that so many of the characters are just stiff and one-dimensional. They really are not overly interesting so it is hard to really connect with them and the tasks they are facing. Unlike Marvel who have excelled with dysfunctional groups who fight amongst themselves as well as the forces of evil, this group seems to be going through the paces rather than being fully engaged with the task at hand and each other.In the end "Justice League" is better than I expected, and the two bonus scenes in the credits show some interesting potential down the road. As it is, it is flawed entertainment that requires audiences to overlook a lot of issues. 3 stars out of 5
If you are going to create a cinematic universe, why not start with solo movies? This movie and BVS are the product of a studio with no patience. SPOILERS! 1) Terrible Character Development: This studio gave us no backstory to Wonder Woman and Batman when BvS arrived in theaters, so it flopped. Once again we get no backstory to Aquaman, Cyborg, or Flash. Even Batman hasn't had a solo movie in this DC universe. How do you decide to reboot Batman and you don't even have a solo movie for its central character?! We see this same problem with Suicide Squad. Rushed ensembles with no true backstories and character development. 2) Flashbacks to Mortal Kombat Annihilation:The scene in Atlantis with Aquaman and Mera was cringe x10. The CGI was abysmal and the dialogue exchange between them was even worse. Luckily, James Wan is directing the solo movie (a good director), so there is still hope. I get the feeling that any solo movie will be great, just as long as Zack Snyder has nothing to do with it. Wonder Woman was a great solo movie, then she is thrown into this embarrassment of a movie and her acting becomes flat and unemotional. I blame the director. Ben Affleck just looked so bored throughout the movie. Cyborg's CGI was stuck in the beta phase. It was so bad. Even 1980's Robocop looked better than this. 3) One Mother Box to Rule Them AllThe plot was a literal rip off of Lord of The Rings. One box is given to the Atlantians, another to the Amazons, and the final box is given to man. And man must bury the box at an undisclosed location so that they don't become corrupted. In the movie, modern science has no idea how the box is even supposed to work, so I am not sure how a medieval peasant would figure it out. I'm not even sure in what way they would become corrupted since a single box is completely useless. Steppenwolf looks like Sauron and he must gather the boxes to unlock their power. What an incredibly lazy plot. 4) Your hero is only as great as its villain How do you top fighting a colorless CGI monster with no important backstory or presence in BvS? You get the heroes to fight another colorless CGI monster with no important backstory or presence! There's nothing cerebral or cunning about Steppenwolf. Just a big guy that likes smashing things with a giant hammer. In the comics, he looks human. Why couldn't they at least have a person instead of a CGI monster? I'm just going to watch the solo movies from now on. I feel like Justice League 2 will add on more heroes with zero backstories, to fight another colorless giant CGI monster with zero backstory and simplistic motivations.
The movie was complete disappointment for me. No deep content. When i was watching the movie i never fell excitement or joy. All predictable and boring. Your music also disappointed me. You come Superman alive and you did not play John Williams superman theme, that was sad. I am sorry but the movies from 40 years past are much better than this. Also what about the flash, bad actor bad role. Your low budget flash TV series even better than this. Flash and Superman were my favorite heroes sorry but you ruined them. Please do not make any other movies or learn something from marvel.
Finally the Justice League movie has arrived. Some of us have waited all of our lives for this film, but is it any good?Justice League is directed by Zack Snyder and stars Ben Affleck, Gal Gadot, Henry Cavill, Cieran Hinds, Jason Mamoa, Ezra Miller, Amy Adams, Jeremy Irons and J.K. Simmons. The story picks up where Batman V Superman left us. After the death of Superman the world has descended into chaos, but it's only the beginning. An alien invasion is on it's way led by the ruthless Steppenwolf. Now our heroes must put their differences aside and work together to save the planet!It's well known that this film had a very difficult production. Zack Snyder had to step down do to a family tragedy and Joss Whedon took over and did some rewrites and shot extra scenes. One of my biggest fears going into this film was that it would feel like to different movies into one. With to different directors with each there distinct style it definitely was a risk, but i would say that it's not the case. Justice League feels like it's one director's vision, luckily. But still this film suffers from a lot of problems. If you have been following my account for a while you will know that Justice League is one of my most anticipated films of the year. I also liked most of the other DCEU films, but sadly Justice League is a step down in my opinion. My main complaint and the biggest issue with it is that it feels very rushed in it's storytelling. A lot of conflicts are set up extremely quickly and therefor you don't feel the emotion that clearly was intended from the director. The rumor going around is that Warner Bros. mandated the films 2 hour run time, and in a lot of instances it feels like something is missing. Even whole scenes feels like they are missing. Also the CGI in this film Sometimes looks very bad and this takes you out of the movie sadly. These are the main complaints i have. As for the positives there are still a lot of great things here. The new characters of Aquaman, The Flash and Cyborg are all portrayed very well and, though rushed, compelling characters. Especially Ezra Miller's Flash provides a lot of the humor. This is another good thing for some. Surprisingly Batman delivers a lot of the humor and i think it suite his character in this film. Justice League is a quite funny film and much more lighthearted than previous installments of this franchise. Sometimes though this becomes too much as the films lacks the seriousness that films like Wonder Woman had. The film is definitely best in the first half. I think the death of Superman is handled very well in the first act. The team dynamic is also a clear positive. The members have interesting arguments and conversations that we didn't get enough of. And when the team is United and start fighting, it's exciting for any fan to watch! To sum up my thoughts Justice League is overall a disappointment. It feels rushed in almost every way and the story and film as a whole suffers from it. Also Steppenwolf as the villain feels like your everyday disposable Marvel villain like Malekith. There still are good things to see in this film and while watching i was entertained, but Justice League should have been much better. The first time this legendary team is on screen should have been an epic moment but it wasn't. Sadly.Final rating: 6/10
Funny that at least half of these positive reviews were made by a week-old,fresh accounts.These "fans" will always get mediocre movies as long as they protect them.Anyway,this is the 4th time of DCappointment.(w.woman was good). DC has officially become MCU 2.0.DC fans are criticizing MCU movies for obvious reasons.Yet they praise J.league even though it is just like a typical marvel/MCU movie. DC has become the very thing that DC fans hate and criticized over years. Villain was so weak,flash and aquaman were cringe(especially flash),pacing was so fast. The comedy was so forced and jokes were bad placed. Some people thought that they should make flash,cyborg,aquaman solo movies before the JL in order to develop the characters.And those people were absolutely correct.Those 3 characters really lacks development. DC is still making tons of mistakes in movie industry.I think they really need to reconsider the future of dc movies.
Unlike BvS, in this all the characters have their character and  personality defined.The Flash is the nicest of all, he is the comic  relief all the time. Aquaman is like a rocker, a rebel without a cause  who is enjoying "la vida loca" and I want to see him in his solo movie.  Cyborg is the most bitter, as it is a marginalized human-machine- alien  mix. Batman and Wonder Woman have a good chemistry, and WW is still  amazing. This is the Superman that I wanted to see in the cinema.  The aspect of the parademons is incredible, they are like a kind of  hybrid between vampires and insects and the combats with the  protagonists are spectacular. Steppenwolf is horrible, very soft,  lacked rudeness and character, in addition the CGI is bad, it seems a  badly made video game.  The CGI in Themyscira for example is terrible, but the action sequence  is impressive. The reshoots are noticeable, like the CGI to remove the  mustache to Henry Cavill.  The dialogues of the film are not very good. The story is simple and is  set for the common viewer to understand, simply "the bad guy wants 3  mother boxes to take down the world."  The film fix some holes in BvS. The colors of the film are really high,  they are alive and with intensity, totally different from BvS because  of what the darkness was criticized.  The film is cut, the priority of WB is obvious, and the scissors  between the action scenes is visible to the naked eye, in addition many  of the scenes of the trailers are not here.  The action is good but in the previous films it is better. OST of  #DannyElfman is forgettable, you just hear the theme of classic  superman of 1978 and Batman of 1989 (And at the beginning when it comes  in WW you hear Hans Zimmer's). The previous films were action dramas  and the change of tone of this film is action adventure and comedy  (they started the change with WW) and take the right path. It is not an  epic film but in spite of all the failures I have HOPE in this  universe. I liked it very much.  PS: the two post-credits scenes are very good.
I wasn't too sure about 'Justice League', but was assured that it was the sort of movie we liked, so off we toddled. There are clearly gaps in our knowledge of super hero recent events. Mebbe they were on Fox. Anyway, Superman is dead! How the hell did THAT happen? Who is Cyborg? When did Khal Drogo eschew the steppe for the deep?The earth is under attack. No surprises there. This time it's Steppenwolf and a host of dodgy CGI's. Steppenwolf looks to be your standard or garden earth imperiler. I don't know why he is called Steppenwolf. Hermann Hesse might. Dunno. Haven't read it.. Logic would indicate that it was to segue into "Born to be Wild' but it didn't and the movie is the poorer for it.Steppenwolf is looking for three mystic boxes to put together to bring something that might be his mother back to rule the universe. I think. One was held by the Amazons, one by the Atlanteans, and one by a Russian farmer with a shotgun. Batman sets about putting together a team to defeat Steppenwolf. There is Aquaman, Cyborg, the Flash and Wonder Woman. But the Wolfster can go a bit and they are overmatched. To be fair, it's hardly your superhero 'A' team. They decide to bring Superman back from the dead. As you do. I thought that it was lucky that he hadn't been cremated then slapped myself for my stupidity.Superman is bought back from the dead! It was my fervent hope that he 'S' on the outfit would be changed into a 'Z' and his vocabulary would have been reduced to one word; and that word would be 'Brains' but alas, the 'Doom of ZombieMan' was to be a dream unrequited. It starts off promisingly enough with Superman being confused and very cross about recent events and generally smiting hither and thither but Lois Lane turns up and he, Superman, rogers her and gets over his temporary death and subsequent resurrection. The Justice League, now with Superman coming off the bench, set about saving the world. Is it any good?Nope. It's crap. Think 'Interstellar' in tights. The two people sitting next to us were drunk (at 10.00am; well done you!) and they clearly enjoyed it. We weren't and we didn't.Would've been improved by;1. Superman being reborn as one of the living dead 2. 'Born to be Wild' 3. Daenerys Targaryen 4. Being drunk
Wooooow! This movie was everything that I could hoped for in a team of  superheroes movie. It was fun, intense, exciting, full of action and  humor at the same time. And overall one heck of a very entertaining  superhero movie. I had lots of fun watching this movie from beginning  till end. The start of the movie was already making us intrigued, then  slowly the revealing of other superheroes were totally cool. It was  very enjoyable to see one by one introduced to us.  When Wonder Woman was shown again, my wife was very ecstatic and she  immediately was reminded why she loved that movie so much. Then when we  were shown The Flash, Aquaman and Cyborg's abilities when they teamed  up to fight Steppenwolf, it was amazing. But what was very enjoyable  was actually the performance of Ezra Miller as the Flash, who was  characterized as very fun, young superhero. He was able to make me less  upset for taking over the role which I thought should have gone to  Grant Gustin who portrayed as the Flash in the TV series. Lots of the  funny moments involved him. Jason Momoa I think suit the role of  Aquaman (and I cannot wait to see his solo movie in 2018). While Cyborg  was the one character that felt not too much explored (perhaps only my  feeling), although he did have brief moment of fun when relating with  Barry Allen.  The action sequences here were absolutely thrilling, intense and  greatly done. There were so many of them that I loss count (not that I  was really counting anyway). The solo fights of the superheroes, their  brief internal fights and of course the climax scene which was totally  awesome but still showed a bit of surprisingly funny moment (be sure  not to miss that part). There were not a lot of dramatic moment here  but as a movie of superhero team, this one certainly did not  disappoint. My wife and I who are fans of comic superheroes, were  really satisfied and absolutely thrilled with the whole movie. We even  think of possibly watching the movie once again.  The special effects and the sound effects were awesome! I am confident  that you would get an even better experience watching it in a good  quality theaters, especially ones with Dolby Atmos or in IMAX as it was  shown in the end credit scene that the movie was specially formatted  for IMAX. Talking about the end credit scene, there was 1 fun scene in  the middle and another important scene at the very end which would give  us excitement of the future movie of DC Extended Universe.   I know that some people still could not find the good in the movie,  perhaps due to the bias/low expectation, but I totally feel that it  would be a shame if this movie was not enjoyed as a fun superhero  movie. I honestly hope it would make most people satisfied. I am really  recommending this to be seen as soon as you can, so you could discuss  the movie with your friends or families.
I'm not a DC hater, nor am I a Marvel fanboy, and it's sad i have to start my review like this. I want DC to give Marvel some healthy competition while carving out their own identity, however Man of Steel, Batman v Superman, and Suicide Squad haven't given me hope. I had a good time with Wonder Woman but Justice League will be the deciding factor of it was one lucky shot or the beginning of correcting old faults.Justice League takes place after the death of Superman as the world mourns, despite 70% of the world hating him how i remembered. A strange being by the name of Steppenwolf emerges and searches for three Mother Boxes that can bring a extreme level of destruction to the world. Bruce Wayne and Diana realize they can't do it all alone, so they bring a team together to fight and save the world.As this is was a first time introduction to Cyborg, Aquaman and The Flash, the film does show they have some good chemistry back and forth with the team as they all individually show off their powers to help in a fight. Ezra Miller as The Flash in particular brings a lot of personality and Wonder Woman brings a sense of big sister keeping the little brothers together. Yes, we do get a moment with Superman and does lead to a fairly rousing moment.But how does the villain feel on screen, well, honestly, STEPPENWOLF IS BORING. There is no character no clear motivation to why he is doing the things he is and proves that super villains just don't translate to live action (see X-Men: Apocalypse as a example). Also Cyborg, is interesting as his backstory seems, we never see it all come to play. The visuals are very much Zack Snyder, and at the same time there is a strangely over sexualized tone to Wonder Woman in how she is filmed (with occasional upskirt shots, and a lot of focus on her back) and poses the argument of the "male gaze" on several occasions.To me, applauding Justice League for not sucking as much is like applauding a D student for getting a C on a final test. While there are moments of fun, some solid chemistry between the leads, i still feel like we still are a far distance for Justice to be truly served for the DC Extended Universe.Also, there is a couple post credits scenes. One of them is a kind light hearted moment, and the other.....well go see and find out.
One year and 7 months since BvS, the Trinity is back with additional members. A half-man half-robot guy, a man who can talk to fish, and a man who can only push something when he is running. First, let's talk about each member character's development except the Trinity. First is Aquaman. Because of his role is somehow important in this movie, he's got a lot of background story. Can't explain more because there is a spoiler on it. Next is Cyborg. He has similar portion with the man who uses fork to fight. However, he has a significant role for the movie. Last is Barry Allen. The movie brings premise to Flash movie in the next year. Overall, it is great.Move to the plot. Personally, I do find it fast-paced :( Maybe it is true that Zack Snyder is lack on delivering the story. Up until now, it bothers me why Warner Bros used this kind of plot to bring the league. Nevertheless, I was delightful to see the action scenes. The first last battle makes me shivers.Conclusion's time! Justice League is a nice-packed of several action scenes movie. I would say that this movie is a jumping stone for their next crossover because of its lack essence of the story. For fanboys, there are lot of hints that you can find in the movie. It pleases your thirst, I mean hunger, for comic book references. The score is 8 of 10. (If it is seen by the action, I would definitely give it 9)' P.S : There are two post end credit scenes. To be honest, the last credit scene almost make me lost my mind on DC Cinematic Universe. Totally love it.
Well, once again we have the generic, boilerplate, superhero team flick. Team spends the first part of the movie unable to be a team. Then they finally and miraculously get it together just in time to fight the latest unstoppable big bad, who plans to destroy the city/country/continent/planet/galaxy/universe. I'm Shocked! Shocked I Say, that they pull together and pull though just enough and we find out the city/ country/continent/planet/galaxy/universe is safe until the next, even bigger bad, who is waiting their turn patiently to rain down destruction when the next installment drops in two years.At least this episode had a few obviously Whedonesque quipisms to drop into the tedium between the deadly dull plodding throughline Zack Snyder had deathmarched the audience into, but it was not enough to save us or the movie. I honestly felt like some of our protagonists should have been checking their watches an hour into the movie and asking, "Can we go beat the bad guy already?" I am tired of this movie. I was tired of this movie when I saw this movie three movies ago.
Well, once again we have the generic, boilerplate, superhero team flick. Team spends the first part of the movie unable to be a team. Then they finally and miraculously get it together just in time to fight the latest unstoppable big bad, who plans to destroy the city/country/continent/planet/galaxy/universe. I'm Shocked! Shocked I Say, that they pull together and pull though just enough and we find out the city/ country/continent/planet/galaxy/universe is safe until the next, even bigger bad, who is waiting their turn patiently to rain down destruction when the next installment drops in two years.At least this episode had a few obviously Whedonesque quipisms to drop into the tedium between the deadly dull plodding throughline Zack Snyder had deathmarched the audience into, but it was not enough to save us or the movie. I honestly felt like some of our protagonists should have been checking their watches an hour into the movie and asking, "Can we go beat the bad guy already?" I am tired of this movie. I was tired of this movie when I saw this movie three movies ago.
Don't listen to the Marvel fans. This movie is great, tons of fun and LOTS of action. The characters are great and the story is fast-paced. The Flash steals the show and Aquaman is no longer a joke. Batman and Wonder Woman are always great and Superman.... Well, you'll just have to see it for your self. You  can't ask for a better time at the movies!
Its the same old story when it come to films. Critics demolish a film and people who are interested to watch it don't and end up watching it illegally then realizing it was amazing. I experienced this when great reviews came out for guardians of the galaxy 2, I went to watch it and hated it. I enjoyed this film personally but don't take my word for it go watch it for your self. The movie brings together what we all hoped for, a team. its fun, bright and energetic with a balance of seriousness.A piece of advice don't go into this movie expecting to watch a movie on the level of the dark knight. In my opinion the only film to ever get close to that was the dark knight rises. As for the DC cinematic universe expect an array of bright movies the next possible dark movie you'll get is probably THE BATMAN.
Justice League was Fantastic! This was for all the comic book and super hero fans and the DC Extended Universe delivered! There was plenty of action throughout, the plot was straightforward and it flowed well. It was a great time seeing 6 of the DC characters we know and love finally get together for the first time on the big screen and their characterization and interaction was enjoyable and on par. This is not a movie laden with thought provoking questions or deals with heavy social issues. It's just good guys vs bad guys and it goes great with popcorn!
I grew up with DC and JLA (and Superfriends). Gal Gadot is perfect and WB got Wonder Woman 'right'. But she can't save this film. it's just dull. If you are going to spend your money, go spend it on Thor Ragnarok - it's visually more impressive and has an actual plot that you can invest yourself in; Justice League's plot doesn't have any hooks to latch onto, and while we love the characters, and the cast has finally been well thought out, with the exception of Wonder Woman the costumes are still a failure and the story is all over the map making little sense and not allowing for any emotional investment in any character other than Superman - whose roll has nothing to do with the threat at hand or the history of it. Go see Thor.
I'm a die hard marvel fanboy. But honestly nowadays marvel just way out of their tracks turning their action movies into some low-budget-cringy-parody movies. It's not cool, man. Especially when they ruined Thor's characters. It makes me upset.But for this Justice League, I was amazed! The jokes are on point, they played the characters so well and natural, and so realistic for today's society! And the punch-up-lines of the jokes was on point, so cool, without ruining any characters just like the Comic Books! But idk why the Batman feels so dark this time...Yeah, I'm the sad marvel fans especially for the Ragnarok movies. Although the Justice League movies plot was simplified and played in a safe way plot, it really made me fulfilled for craving such a cool-pack superhero movies! Well done DC!
First of all, forget the dark tone of MoS and BvS, new Zack Snyder movie Justice League it is a comedy! And I think this could be one of problems of this movie. SO here is 3 main problems. PLS beware of spoilers below!!Lets start with obvious problem which we saw in BvS and Suicide Squad 聳 montage and editing. Warner seems like didn't learn they bad lesson at all. JL is a great example of terrible editing. All 2 Hours of movie you see different scenes hard cut one-by-one . Such switching between locations, Time and characters, may look like you was napping for few minutes and then suddenly wake up in the middle of some action scene. Time on screen for such characters like: Comm. Gordon, Mera, Martha Kent, Alfred - overall takes 5-6 minutes of screen time. Together! Some scenes which you was able to see and enjoy in Trailers are cutted. Well, probably fifth part of all scenes in all trailers - are NOT in the movie! SO, editing I think is the main and the biggest minus. Second, it the tone and genre. By looking on colors you see that studio already leave gray tones like were in first movies, now we see more warm colors like it was in WW Themiscira world. That definitely positive moment. But changing genre by 180 degrees, from dark drama to colorful comedy, even for good purposes, it is completely stupid decision by Warner and DC. Some of action\fight scenes looks completely not dynamic. They are boring and you don't empathize to protagonist. Remember Bat fight in warehouse in BvS? You won't see this in again. Instead of this, we saw in opening scene, battle choreography like in Batman 1989, Michael Keaton level. I know that Danny Elfman was happy to bring 1989 Bat-theme to this movie, but create movie in 2017 and makes it style like it was from earlier 90-s, that is damn shame. Third, characters and their chemistry. Main Antagonist. Forget about Steppenwolf from trailers and his lines "no protectors here .bla bla bla this world will fall..bla bla bla" and etc. and - Nope. Our guy spoke simple and annoying things so often that maybe this is main reason why JL need to stop him. The colors used for Stepenwolf - cold-gray pallet. Which is, I think, too insensibly for such character. Superman. Yes he is in the League. Yes he was returned from the dead. I will left details of this process. But the emotion that we saw on Clark face after his 'returning', and emotions after a day in hugs with Lois, changed his view on things. From brutal and cold Bizzaro to 'Your best friend neighbor Superman, from Kansas' only few hours in corn field with Lois and Mom, and you are ready for saving world and joking together with your new teammates.Details, Mistakes, Mismatches all of this could by only 2 reason. On my opinion those were caused by: changing director + reshooting and hard cut. Just few quick examples. SPOILER below!! After Clark has been returned to his memory and mood, he flight to help his new friend. We saw him in in new suit where this suit come from? Who made it? We doesn't have answer. Another, very personal mistake. On first scenes somewhere close to abandoned nuclear plant, we saw old building with letters on the top 聳 袨孝袝袥, - which translates as HOTEL 聳 from Russian. In the scenes of final battle we see, another (or even the same building) with letters 袚袨孝袝袥鞋 聳 which also means HOTEL 聳 but from Ukrainian. Yes maybe for many of you it is just small details, but believe me for Slavic people, in modern world, this is huge error. And it is based on disrespect from movie makers who just don't gives a sh*t on such things. I want to believe that this is Joss Whedon feature. He always put into his movies some empty civilian personages who are suffer during battles. And from Avengers time he didn't learn nothing about alphabets of other countries.Positive moment(s). Chemistry of the Heroes. Relationships between Diana and Bruce, Victor and Barry,Arthur and all others members, it is great examples of how teams should look like. The Flash and Aquman are main positive moments and only because of them rating are higher than 5 stars. As a conclusion, my verdict 6.5\10. I really want to believe that we will see Ultimate version, and this will bring rating growth. But for now 聳 I can stop expecting any positive moments from DC and Warner. They must to sit down, calm down, clear their minds and heard and find a final decision, what are they want to see more. Only money from fiction movies or movies with ideas and souls.
Not sure what movies the critics e.g. rottentomatoes watched..as conspiracy theories go, one is tempted to wonder if they were paid to tear apart, and it looks inconsistent esp considering they loved Wonder Woman..Anyway I think JL has nailed it, by the standards of the animation episodes which I thought are quite entertaining..Ben Affleck nails it as Bruce Wayne and as Batman, Gal Gadot IS Wonder Woman..and finally they've got Superman right (to me)..and Flash, Cyborg and Aquaman are great as well (also Jeremy Irons is great as Alfred), and maybe this is a good precursor to their standalone movies..It's worth keeping in mind that this is a superhero flick, an escape, a fantasy etc -- if one wants a real life uplifting catharsis, one should stick with The Shawshank Redemption and so on.. JL is certainly not perfect, it does not do character development on the scales of the Dark Knight or some such..but it is definitely entertaining, fast-paced, positive and relatively lighthearted, and the characters are mostly placed correctly (at least along the lines of the animation episodes), as individuals and as part of the League.. this is certainly comparable to Wonder Woman in terms of how hopeful it feels overall.. and in some (inexplicable!) sense Synder's take on the previous movies also makes a bit more sense now, within this universe..at some level.. I also found it amusing to be reminded of the Batman animation theme and the John Williams Superman theme..!
As both a Marvel and Dc fan, this movie exceed all of expectations. Such a great hype and action packed film. I loved every single character and how well they developed together. I would see this movie 10 more times!! The only flaws I saw with the movie was some CGI but hey. Not every movie is perfect, the visuals were amazing and was just a epic movie to sit and watch and bring to life finally.
I just cant begin to tell you how amazing this movie was ! There are parts where you go like uhhhh okay, the villain is strong &amp; merciless but i would have liked a little backstory to him just like with Zod. Moreover I could sense there are parts of it cut out and they will make their way into an unlimited 3 hour version of the movie but the transition between characters and the action sequences are amazing. I love how DC has got their act together since Wonder Woman and injected some well placed humor in there. Its not light but its not too dark either. I wouldn't say anything about Superman's return except that its a stroke of absolute genius and I couldn't have asked for a better entry. To sum it up! DC is on the right track now and yeah there are two post credit scenes that will make your wildest dreams come true. You are gonna have fun!
Like many other I have waited eagerly to see the movie but I have highly disappointed On par with BvS.I was so excited to see Batman,aquaman,The flash, Cyborg and my sweet prince Diana (wonder woman) all together under one umbrella. All those gadgets of batman, Raw power of cyborg and aquaman are all seemed really bland and uninteresting to me.I am supposed to like this movie more than avengers cause this has 6 heros avengers had 4 and we barely knew any avenger before the movie.But we know all these characters before the JL movie.It has been seen in the past that these movies concentrate so much in actions and special effect that they put little concentration on the plot.And unfortunately this movie focused way more on action instead of plot.It has a mediocre plot with a forgettable villain and his typical large team of warriors. The story wasn't enough to give the movie a perfect concrete base.They pretty much showed us almost all action scenes on trailers.Well it is normal since they released 4 trailers and tons of TV spotsThe bonding of characters wasn't seem to be deep enough or sincere.Well it is normal cause it was like cyborg,flash,aquaman were all waiting and ready for batman,w.woman to find them and ask help.I had 0 excitement for this movie when the theater gave a break.This movie seemed as somewhat "x men apocalypse vol 2"The cyborg's cgi is almost like those shitty cgi s from dc/cw shows.Sorry DC.I cannot let you fool me again.I don't think I can pay to watch your movies for the next 3-4 years.
First of all, I'm a huge DC fanboy and I was so excited to wait to watch the movie as soon as it on air. So after 2hs watching the movie, I have to say that I'm so disappointed with this JL movie.Even I'm a fan who read the comic and watched all the cartoon of JL, none of them can make me feel this worse than this movie. Everything was a mess, Batman was like an emotional girl and Superman was like a teenager with the superpower who can kill the boss with one punch.I doubt that WB made the Production team cut so many scenes of the the movie like what they did on BvS before.Now I will wait and watch again this movie in HD if they have an "uncut" one. But if they really have one, I will have to say this to WB: "shame, shame of you WB, don't do sh*t with DC anymore and we want justice for Justice League"
I really enjoyed this movie although there are a few things that definitely stood out that holds JL back from being well-rounded.1. Pacing/Transitions. One thing I enjoyed about WW was the fact that it flowed a lot better in my opinion compared to BvS (theatrical cut). The beginning of JL was choppy and from what I understand they had to make the movie less than 2 hours via the WB CEO. You definitely see that in the pacing which the movie honestly needed about 15-20 more minutes to smooth things out. 2. Villain. Steppenwolf overall was a pretty good villain but could have been more. One thing that disappoints me about any superhero movie are villains that aren't fully utilized to their potential. Those are the two things that stood out to me the most about JL that left me wanting more of a better product.On the other hand, the character development is really good. I enjoyed Flash, Cyborg, Aquaman. Ezra Miller is a great Barry Allen. Ray Fisher &amp; Jason Mamoa fit their characters really well. WW, Batman, and Superman were all great but it was nice to see JL uplift the new superheroes &amp; pave their way for their future solo movies, etc.The movie was really fun, jokes were there and most of them were well timed. The overall tone was light-hearted than BvS, but I personally liked BvS being a darker tone.There are two end credit scenes! Be sure to stay!!! I believe the way that JL ended it opens up a realm of possibilities for DC. I am excited about the future and what DC does with their characters. I know they're 5 movies in right now but they're learning from their mistakes for the most part. This franchise has a bright future as long as they continue to not make the same common mistakes that plagued a lot of their other movies.8.5/10.
Wow where to start. First off HUGE disappointment of a movie. Why was this even made is what I was asking myself when it finally finished... There is no substance with terrible directing and utterly boring action sequences that have no sense of purpose or lead to anything meaningful. It is a worse version of BvS and by a long shot too. Imagine BvS with another 5 more heroes. Yeah you get my drift... I'll give it a generous 2 because Wonder Woman movie was top notch and she happened to be in this.
Word of mouth will hurt this thing because it's mangled and dumb with no heart at all. Quite frankly, too dumb to enjoy. I know fanboys everywhere are circling the wagons to praise this movie but that in and of itself proves what I'm saying. Fanboys wanted to like it and apparently will look past all of its flaws.Everyone else is saying or will soon be saying that JL is a dumb popcorn flick at best but really nothing special and just as bad as BvS. How can a film follow something that bad but still give anyone high expectations? Yet, thanks to good trailers, that's exactly what happened.Well, the actual movie is going to lead to general disappointment especially if you're not already a fan. Campy, cheesy fluff pretending to be dark and serious usually fizzles out fast. Yet, as MOS proved this may be an indestructible franchise that won't die no matter how bad the stuff they churn out. No spoilers but trust me, the ending won't leave a good taste at all.Just think, some people thought they were disappointed by MoS and BvS. If that's the case, then wait until they get a load of this thing. They added Flash,Cyborg but dragged that cool characters down to this level.
I had low expectations for this movie. The trailers did not do it for me, and seeing DC/WB track record I was very hesitant and worried. Seeing the movie last night my low expectations and worry came true. I really wanted to love this movie, but just as with BvS I got out of the theater feeling I had wasted my money and lost 2hrs of my life. This is better than BvS, but then again: what isn't? Not sure where to put this movie. It is, at times, sort of messy "fun" as Suicide squad was, and it is not as dumb as BvS. JL tries to follow the Marvel formula a bit, throwing in a few one liners and the movie have a few fun moments, and although those funnies mostly work they also feel too forced in there. Personally I still think Man of Steel is the best movie from DC so far, too bad they messed up the start and ending of that movie, otherwise MoS would have been a great movie. Personally I did not like WW, although it had its moments. So where does this belong? Well, let us start with the negative: The CGi is actually really bad, just as bad as in Wonder Woman, or even worse. I see better CGi on TV nowadays, and I am not sure why DC and WB cannot do it better. Where did the money go? Affleck's salary? TVs Smallville had better effects, or look at Agents of Shield of today; they do great things with a fraction of the budget. The story is way too rushed. That apparent WB corporate directive of keeping the movie shorter then 2h seem to have done a lot of damage. Not that 30min more would make that big of a difference, but I will assume that a director's cut will be slightly better. This is especially sad for me since in the comics DC usually have great very well written stories. Here, not so much聟 Probably due to being too rushed the movie has a pace issue. Either it moves too slow, or too fast. When you see the movie you'll probably understand what I mean. Cyborg does not work. Partly it is the bad CGi, but the actor is not very good in this role either. The villain does not work. Sure if you've read the comics you do, sort of, have an idea and know a bit of backstory, but in the movie none of that comes out 聳 we are not clearly told who he is (except for some "historical" exposition), we do not know what motivates him, why he is there. The little we do get to know is not enough for the general movie goer. The Villain is also very, very generic. Probably the most generic villain we've seen in any superhero movie. He shows up, with bad CGi, they fight for a bit, and聟 well, you can guess the rest. One of the worst villains I've seen in a movie like this. A lot of critics have praised The Flash in this movie, personally I do not really see it. Sure he has a few fun moments, but it feels a bit forced and too much "let's copy Marvel" funnies about it. There are a few major plot holes, and a few convoluted moments that ruins the experience and as a critic those moments are very hard to avoid. You can see them as plot devices (at best), OR: only forced upon badly written moments if you want to be more direct. I will update this part with detailed spoilers once I've seen the movie again. Positive: It is decently entertaining, at times... and it is not BvS bad. Wonder woman is pretty good in this movie, even better then in her own movie I would say, and the side-characters work very well. Aquaman is good. The acting okay and聟 well聟that is pretty much it. Summery: Nothing fantastic nor great, JL is not a good movie. As a superhero movie this is okayish entertainment and Justice League is better than crap like Fan4stic or the horrible BvS, but is that really the comparison you want to make with a JL movie? As a Superhero movie I would give this a 3, but as a movie this is really bad and about a 1, so I ended up giving this a 2 in total. Not worth the ticket price unless you are very young. Or: if you do not mind seeing dumb story-lines and you just came to see some bad CGi action, then this may work.... For the normal movie-goer and for us looking for quality, this is not for us. If this had come out 20y ago, it would have been pretty great, nowadays we expect more, want more, deserve more, and with this talent and all the money spent they should have produced a lot better movie. A bad movie, but almost okayish Superhero movie.Edit: Saw it again yesterday (pirated - do not watch this at the cinema!! Do not waste your money!!) and I need to lower my score. Horrible movie and seeing it again, more focused, I see so much crap I do not know what to do. Worst movie of 2017, and that is saying something.
When you think superhero films, you probably remember such hits as Iron Man, Thor, Captain America, and The Avengers. The last thing that comes to mind is any DC movie that has come out in recent years. Many people thought that after the end of the Dark Knight Trilogy that we would see a resurgence in the DC nostalgia that made the company bigger than Marvel at one point. Those hopes were dashed when Man of Steel turned out to be a dark, gritty CGI mess that tried way too hard to be relevant. The moody and drab undertone of the film made us feel to glum to remember the old Saturday morning cartoons that were filled with fun, adventure, and action all rolled into one brilliantly performed show. Next was Batman v Superman which had been hyped for three years, and all we got was eight minutes of fighting and over two hours of talking and exposition that we just didn't care about. Suicide Squad was lacking in the department of character development. Instead the producers wanted big names and flashy effects to sell the movie. That didn't work. Finally, we have this: take all the previous DC movies mentioned (Except the Dark Knight Trilogy, the only films DC got right), put it in a blender while adding aqua man, flash, and cyborg, blend it all together, then turn off the lights. The resulting disaster is Justice League. This is what you don't do with superhero films. It would be like Joss Whedon making the Avengers in 2005 with Iron man being made eight years later.The movie does not follow any of the source material, instead relying on Ben Affleck and Gal Gadot to carry the weight of the film. Everyone else just seems to be along for the ride with none of the other characters getting their own movie yet, so we have no idea what their motivations for joining the Justice League are. The film once again goes into dark and gritty territory with everything happening at once with little to no previously known information about half the main characters. Anyone who isn't a comic book junkie was asking "Why is there a robot and a fireman in this scene?" Just another too serious flick that betrays the source material and hopes that big Hollywood names will save it (Spoiler alert: they don't).
My rating of 1 does not indicate of how bad the movie quality is rather my disappoint with the ultimate result. My review doesn't comes out as a pure hate machine but rather due to the epic disappointment of one might feel after waiting for so long to witness the most epic team up quite possibly of this century to turn into a mediocre generic film.This should've been the most epic saga in DCEU's continuity but alas rushing to compete with Disney finally took a toll on this franchise. The characters are well enough on their own but their development as individuals are rather paltry. The cinematography is awkward at times as evident from multiple re shoots done by Joss Whedon.The CGI in some parts are terribly glaring to avoid and it feels too much green screen effect that makes your head hurt while watching in a dark room. Some are too bright while some are too dark. The color grading is very inconsistent with the background. As you all know Superman returns from the dead (which is kinda given at this point) but his resurrection isn't handled well enough. What should've been the rekindling of the hope people lost like the Rebirth of a Phoenix is marred by botched character interactions and idiotic dialogues. The supporting characters such as Mera, Martha Kent and Alfred are wasted even further. One of the most highlighting parts of BVS was the interactions between Alfred and Bruce engaging in both morally and logical decisions. Sadly it's been reduced to banal banter between them and others. I'm not going to highlight the humor since it's overdone and doesn't fit organically in this film narrative. Humor is good and should be present but not forced and overstuffed like Disney films recently have become. The villain is generic along with musical score by Danny Elfman which is just rehashing of the same old stuff. Wait for the 4K or bluray release to see edited scenes as consistent with DC's film which might be better.
I cant really start to type anything but to trash this movie with this awful CGI and its over reliance on it I dunno what Zack Snyder is doing with the 300 mill budget really no plot what so ever and no introduction to the villain or the team and the super downgraded Batman and the god awful big black bathing suit and its just doesn't feel like a DC movie with all the laughs and bad jokes and please Zack change the way you direct the yellow tint is really annoying it was fun back in 2006 when 300 came out but not anymore.please resign and stop ruining more DC movies I and many more think that way
As a DC fanboy I give up and throw in the towel on DCEU movies, Just give up and leave the awesome movie making to the more superior Marvel studios, I felt a bigger connection to Meek on Thor Ragnorak to any characters on JL, The Flash character has been done before and better In Days of future past, Jason Mamoa looks like a biker more then the king of Atlantis, someone needs to feed Gal Gadot because I want my wonder woman a fit warrior not like Tom Hanks in the end of Philadelphia. The Story was as messy as Donald Trumps hair in the wind.The CGI was as fake as Kylie Jenners face. All in All I hate this movie with such disdain. I hate it like Kevin Spacey hates boobies. Don not waste your time and money go see Thor again.
Note: The review is free of spoilers till the "--SPOILERS AHEAD--" ahead line.I liked Justice League.However, I was disappointed with the way it all went. I was expecting more from DC. No doubt it's fun, sometimes I felt like they're trying to imitate Marvel. The unexpected punchlines are usually seen in Marvel movies, they brought it to Justice League too. No doubt the jokes were funny. But the narration is what disappointed me the most. Even after BvS, Wonder Woman and now Justice League (biggest DC instalment), I'm unable to see where DC is headed.The narration is very confusing. JL also fails in giving a direction where DC wants to head. The movie has problems with pacing as well. Sometimes its too rushed and fast-paced and sometimes it just goes total Slo-mo. It seems like Zack and Joss weren't on it at point. I think the movie would have just gone fine with Joss Whedon. Also, the CGI isn't up to the mark either. No, it's not total crap like Green Lantern, but isn't great either.Coming on to characters-- Flash, rather than being young-y, spirited and wise like the one in the TV series, feels irritating like Lex Luther of BvS. In fact, you'll feel like it's Robin under the mask. Cyborg and Aquaman do fine, but the lifesaver of this movie is Gal Gadot's Wonder Woman and Batman (Ben Afleck), Superman is great too, but the contrast of light (Superman) and dark (Batman) is still missing. The most ironic thing about this movie is that at the end, you'll feel like some characters weren't even required for it all to happen. Superman, however, is the heart of the movie and has a much bigger role than you might have expected.The score is average, I personally believe that the scores in BvS and Wonder Woman were both great, Justice League's isn't as par with the other ones. You'll hear the old Batman and Superman themes once again, except that they're pretty generic. Compare this to the remastered edition of Spiderman theme song we heard in Spiderman Homecoming and it, unfortunately, fails to keep up here as well. Won't bother much if you choose to ignore the score tho.And Steppenwolf (I know it sounds funny, right?). Steppenwolf is your typical villain. He comes, fights, and loses. That's it. Unlike Hela, who we recently saw in Thor: Ragnarok, Steppenwolf isn't interconnected with the heroes, he carries no concrete vision, as I mentioned already, he comes and goes. Steppenwolf fight scenes had really, really bad CGI, especially above the neck.-- SPOILERS AHEAD --So the movie starts with the same DC logo we saw in Wonder Woman (in case you care about that). You'll see some kids who are questioning Superman about the 'S' tag, there's a dramatic flashback of Cyborg, Barry has a job and Wonder Woman looks gorgeous.You'll witness Green Lantern in a flashback scene fighting with Amazoners against Steppenwolf. Perhaps, that is the only Green Lantern scene (forgive me If there were others). Also, there is no recreation of the (in)famous warehouse scene.The movie rushes and lags in between, as I mentioned in the primary review, the movie has a lot of issues with pace. When they fight Steppenwolf, it's mainly Superman and Wonder Woman doing the top job, Batman's the mastermind -- he plans, Barry saves the civilians (no mention of Iris or most of the things we see in the TV Series). Superman is resurrected by Motherboxes.The scene when Superman meets Martha is emotional. It's perhaps, the most moving scene in the whole movie.Whilst the rest of the movie is predictable. There's Steppenwolf, the league unites and beat it. With Barry and Aquaman's humor.-- END OF SPOILERS --All in all, it's not what I expected. It's definitely not better than the animated Justice League of our childhoods. But won't disappoint like BvS or Suicide Squad did, but it's not as good as Wonder Woman either.
Honestly I will make this as short as possible as I do not want to spend any more of my time or have anything to do with this film once this review is done. It is full of nothing but CGI vomit and the directing is atrocious, along with the screenplay among other things and I didn't care one bit about any of the "heroes". When I walked out I thought to myself what's the point of this movie? The answer is simple. Just another cash grab. Looking forward to Avengers: Infinity War and will try to forget I ever watched this tripe! You have been warned.
Everyone knows by now that due to unfortunate circumstances, Zack Snyder (Director) and his wife, Deborah Snyder (Producer) had to leave the project for personal reasons, which enticed to the studio (Warner Bros.) to bring in 'Avengers' director Joss Whedon and ''finish'' it. Ultimately, the film seems to have been almost completely re-written and re-shot. I've read a fair amount from people claiming that the film is still around 80% Snyder's vision, I don't think so.The films original composer (Junkie XL) was quickly dispatched and replaced by Danny Elfman (One could argue that a films score makes up 50% of the film, easily).Danny Elfman's score is completely flat and heartless. There isn't a shred of emotion in a single note. It sounds out of place, is consistently uneven and the little homages to past themes seem to be thrown in and are used at completely the wrong times.Almost every scene where Superman appears, he has a ridiculously expensive, computer generated botch job of a mouth to cover up a moustache that Henry Cavill wasn't allowed to shave off for the re- shoots, due to commitments to another film.As I can recall, there was one scene for Superman where he didn't have the CGI mouth.The tone and atmosphere of Snyder's style is almost completely lifted from the film, something I'm sure was tampered with in post- production.It doesn't have any kind of atmosphere at all really, it just feels empty.The actors are all fine and deliver worthy performances for the characters, it's not their fault that the film which is built around them is a complete disaster.It just goes to show that the studio couldn't care in the slightest about delivering a serious and decent production. They had a release date and they forced themselves to stick to it, regardless of the outcome.Most of the film feels completely rushed and cheap, which it shouldn't, given it had a budget of $300 million.It's simply unacceptable for something of this capacity and scale to be the epitome of a mindless product from a bloodsucking and power driven cooperation.Would it have been such a loss to put the project on hold until Zack and Deborah Snyder returned, or delay the film until everything was as good as could possibly be? Apparently yes.There's been absolutely no respect for the source material, the vision of the original director or the target audience from Warner Bros..Zack Snyder's complete version, I'm sure has its faults and flaws, but nothing can compare to this lacklustre effort.This should have been the best superhero film ever made, but has been dropped and fallen straight to the bottom of the barrel.I could go on and on, but I'll stop there.
The worst, gormless, dumb film I've seen in years. Empty, pretentious, presumptious, childish, fake garbage. If you buy into this appalling rubbish you must be absolutely demented. DCs films - Suicide Squad etc - are so overwhelmingly removed from their compelling comic-book source material it's a crime. Zack Snyder needs to be removed from this franchise immediately and permanently, he has no grasp whatsoever of what made the comics so brilliant and fails each and every time in translating the electrifying vibe of the comics into great cinema. Marvel's films succeed in staying one step ahead. Marvel is clever, punchy, sassy, exciting, engaging. The freeway chase in Civil War was stunning. The fight scenes involving Black Panther re-invented fight scenes and pushed them to a new level. Justice League however is a tedious, mindless bunch of CGI puke. I'm not going to waste any more time on this abysmal mess of a film other than recommending the public avoid Justice League and DC abandon their cinema agenda and re-focus on writing comics. The DC Extended Universe is not an extended universe, it's a black hole, sucking dry the essence of humanity.
Let me start off by saying -- I'm a huge DC fan and a movie buff. I fully appreciate the intricacies involved in bringing something this huge to the screen and I realize there are weaknesses in every movie. That being said 聟It's as if the writers have attempted to cram the entire DC universe into two hours with little consideration for what that does to the plot or the viewer's brain as they try to comprehend this hot mess. On top of that, The villain is the most generic brand of threat-to-the-planet bad guy imaginable and it takes way more energy than I have to take him seriously enough to even care.But that's's okay right? When the writing is bad we can always keep the audience entertained by blowing things up, you know, like in Superman - Man of Steel (in fact, just like in Superman - Man of Steel) where Superman and General Zod knock down all the skyscrapers in Metropolis. Over and over. Pointlessly. For seemingly the last hour of the movie. But we'll need some really exceptional CGI to make that band-aid hold. Which leads to 聟 who releases a movie in 2017 with original Star Wars era CG? I And even that might have worked had they not overreached by so much. And the music? Not so important to the overall movie, but really? What did they do with that massive budget? Maybe they should have paid the actors and actresses a little less and a bit more for the writers, composers and the CGIShort on plot, same old tired action scenes but now with antique CGI, uneven acting (not that there's really much room in this movie for anything resembling acting 聴 ridiculous posing at best) and it only took $300,000,000 to lay another DC egg. How does the same company that is capable of the Dark Knight and Wonder Woman come up with this ... crap?Should come with a warning -- Move along, there's nothing to see here (beyond what you've already seen for free on the trailer).
Wooden acting - Check. Breathtakingly bad CGI - check - Poor lifeless script - Check - Scrappy editing - check.I can see some fans like this film but they need to understand that they would have come out with an even bigger smiles on their faces if this film had been made properly. By the number quips punctuating the appallingly rendered CGI action sequences and shallow characterisations (sorry Aquaman) end up making this film drab. I had no empathy for any of the characters.If we look back to the Superman film of 1978 - it was full of colour - entertaining characters who we cared for and had a sharp witty script.But these modern day Hollywood moguls have let one side of the superhero badly down. The Marvel side has fared pretty well but something seems to have gone wrong with DC (except Wonder woman)If there is a next film the producers need to invest in a clever intelligent script and throw out any demands for one written for kiddie audiences.The director should insist that real locations are used (where possible) - so the actors don't get bored having to pretend they're somewhere other than in front of a green screen. But above all invest emotion into the film.DC fans deserved better than this - Snyder -Terrio - Whedon - hang your heads in shame.
I'm a huge fan of DC Comis. Grew up on those. I also love the Justice League cartoon more than X-Men. With all this said, I write this review. I went to the movie thinking it's going to be great after reading the IMDb reviews. I was wrong. The movie sucks on many levels. The movie lacks any depth of characters, there is no character development, no story just a couple of stylish action scenes. This is a Avengers wanna-be with no character development or story. We see the classic Zack Snyder with style over substance. Wait for the DVD.
I went to see this over the thanksgiving holiday and while it wasn't what I expected I had such a good time it was fun filled with action and even humor it was good I don't get the critics griping about it I had so much fun it was also a perfect family movie as long as you have an older family 'due to the villains could scare kids and also the action may overwhelm the youngest of kids' but aside from that it was a really good time I totally recommend going to see it
Just came from the Cinema and got this awful feeling in my body. That feeling you have when your girlfriend breaks up with you, or you have a big hangover but nothing to eat in the fridge..This movie is the sad future of hollywoods big super hero franchises. I actually kind of liked Batman V Superman, and I was chocked by the last trailer that came out. I thought it looked weird and bad, and my thought became real..I have no idea how a movie like this, gets screened in front of an audience, and then approved to hit cinemas world wide. People don't have any standards anymore, and it seems like it's just a CGI-race for the producers. They even made my favorite superhero useless. In Superman V Batman, they actually destroyed my fears, and made Batman Badass! He had a couple of scenes where he shined. Like when he saves Supermans mother, and he just goes apes**t on those badguys. THAT IS WHAT THE AUDIENCE WANNA SEE!however, the movie had one of the worst endings I've seen in a movie in a loong time. The bad Zack Snyder greenscreen/CG-hell turned out to make the movie worse instead of better. Zack Snyder can't make a good climax for his movies.I think the guy needs a break away from Hollywood for a long time. The man has showed us he can make good movies, but the cgi environments we thought and loved as art, (like in SinCity and 300) turnes out to be just a getaway from what we actually love about movies. That we can relate to them, and make us disappear into a world where everything can become real. But the 60 mins CGI show, just turnes out to be a bad, not well done, gimmick. STOP ruin our beloved childhood heroes while you still can.. This movie was AWFUL!
"Justice League" is a pointless flail of expensive (yet somehow cheap-looking) CGI that no amount of tacked-on quips, or even Gadot's luminescent star power, can rescue.Like Cyborg (Ray Fisher), one of its ostensible heroes, "Justice League" is patched together from disparate elements. Original director Zack Snyder ("Batman v. Superman") left partway through due to a death in the family, leaving Joss Whedon ("The Avengers") to finish up. The result? All the plodding, gray, generic action of a Snyder film with stabs of Whedonian humor that almost never feel organic. There's no sense of purpose here, not even a sense of place.
Justice league is up with transformers 5 as the worst movie I've seen all year.This movies should be an example of what can go wrong when you get 2 writers with different ideas, and two directors with two vastly different styles that don't blend at all.The movie is paced horribly. The first 40 minutes is literally just Character introductions.Speaking of the Characters, they are just bad.Flash is annoying. Aqua man is like a 40 year old hot topic manager trying to be cool. cyborg is just a bad actor. Ben Affleck just doesn't care. Wonder Woman was just okay. And Superman was just bad. he had this weird uncanny-valley face. The CGI was absolutely terrible.The movie was mostly boring and/or cringey.No joke lands.Overall DC just needs to start over with this universe. They've had 5 duds in a row, and it doesn't look to get any better soon.
I remember that day, a few months ago when the trailer for this came out. The fanboy in me literally screamed and danced around the entire house. Fast forward to yesterday when i finally saw it. Zero character development, a laughable steppenwolf, and a movie which just looked like cut scenes from an injustice game sums up this 2 hour disaster. Wonder woman is perhaps the only saving grace, and even that is because of the brilliance of Gadot. Do yourself a favor and skip this one, you'll save time, money, and your hopes will not get shattered into a million pieces like mine did.
1. Affleck once again proves HE IS BATMAN.2. Plays out like a Justice League episode.If you've ever watched a DC animated series like Young Justice or Justice League, then this will be something to enjoy. If you haven't seen those, check them out. They are amazing.3. The only complaint I have is that Danny Elfmans score was so forgettable in comparison to the previous two films. Although it was funny to hear the old Batman and Superman scores integrated. I just think they were going somewhere new with the past few scores and did a complete 180 OK this.I left happier than I've been since Batman v Superman (also amazing) came out. Thank you Zack Snyder and the rest of you guys. Please keep them coming!!!
This is an awful movie. I am really amazed this movie has an average of 7.3 .there isn't one funny joke in it.Flash is supposed to be the comic relief, but fails every time. And the CGI is bad..i can't care about a fully computer generated character.so i was actually falling asleep in the middle of the movie.. the story is boring and the conversations are worse than in the bold and the beautiful. Well..sorry,I'm actually bored writing about this horrible piece of crap..i gave it two stars because it has the most beautiful Mercedes i have seen.
I saw the Film last night and i have not an answer for what they need an budget of 300.000.000 USD. Ugly low-detail locations and semi effects. And this is the end of the world? Roland Emmerich would cry for this crap.the rest of the film is very casual. not the best story so far and the villain is a big joke.
Woah, just watched the movie today and I can say that I am relieved. Going into the movie I was very nervous, but now that i have watched the movie, I can say its worth the watch.Due to the two hour time limit imposed by Warner Bros., the movie definitely seems quite rushed. Because of that, the introduction to the characters seems a little off. Since, I already knew how these characters became who they are, I could make sense of what was going. But for casual movie watchers, its not going to be that great but definitely a entertainment flick for sure.The great side of the movie was the characters and the chemistry between them. Watching them on the big screen is a dream come true. I thought Ezra Miller as Flash was awesome and very funny. I can say the same about the other characters: Aquaman was bad-ass although he had less screen-time, Cyborg was definitely cool and Wonder Woman is as always charming. The other best parts of the movie would be Superman. I would say Superman stole the show. The CGI mustache wasn't that noticeable. But overall he did great. I can say the same about Batfleck. Ben Affleck as Batman is awesome.Now the bad parts of the movie. The main issue was with the villain. Steppenwolf didn't seem so strong. Whenever he was out of the screen, I didn't really care about him. Also rushing is also an issue here because of the two hour limit. The CGI could be even better, but it was pleasing.As a comic book fan, to see the references made in the movie was totally great. And there are two end-credit scenes. You definitely don't want two miss them. I had a great time watching the movie. And I am very hopeful for the upcoming DC movies.
When i walked into this movie, i didn't expect anything but pure disaster. The trailers are not great. i think it's just getting my expectations lower and lower, and even if i ignore the trailers and all, this movie is not really set up for a good start. the Kickstarter of the movie, Batman V Superman: Dawn of justice, is very dull and boring as well as very confusing. but i must say this movie isn't as bad as what it should be- but that isn't saying muchIt had many, MANY problems. one of them, as of course everyone expected it to be- the pacing. this film is very annoyingly confusing pacing. at times it felt super rushed then at times it became so slow. i didn't really felt surprised seeing this because literally, they're trying to make you care and felt sympathy about some characters that you didn't really know, except some characters that are already made appearances on the other movies ( which was not really developed well either) or if you read the comics (of course, not everybody read the comics). and the result is very dull. this is a very obvious problem because how greedy the studio is to make as much many as fast as possible. the second problem i have for this movie is the characters and the quote-unquote humor. as i said before, I really felt nothing about the characters even after all the stuff they shoved right into your face and basically begging for the audience to care. and the worst part is that they are such blank slates with so-called humor. i don't have a problem with humor, but the humor in this movie is so forced it became cringe-worthy . i get how people complain how dark bvs is and i guess they want to try something new but don't do it in such a way that it ruins your characters. seriously it felt as if the characters are basically just waiting turns to say a 'tee-hee' punchline, even characters like BATMAN they ruined one of my most favorite character by how they portrayed batman so suddenly changed in this movie for the sake of 'humor' and lighter mood of the movie. it's very insulting how they turn batman from the dark, serious, brooding, even sometimes violent and doesn't care for anything but his only version of justice, and even try to justify the character once in a while by practically saying some lines that kind of remind us how he's supposed to be. now, the main characters and acting - Jason momoa as aquaman is entertaining to watch but underused. in the beginning, there are some cool scenes featuring him then he's just lost afterwards. ray fisher as cyborg is very boring and his conflict is boring. gal gadot as wonder woman is not as strong as what i expect her to be. she was pretty good in wonder woman but in this movie she's back to her bvs style of acting- boring and bland. Ben affleck as batman other than my earlier complaints is also very underused. he barely even have a decent scene, and it clearly shows how much Ben affleck doesn't want to be there . Henry cavill as superman is practically being as what he's always been in the previous movies but this time he cracks a joke or two and being some kind of last help plot device. Ezra miller as the flash is probably the most decent and the only one who is kind of funny. even though his only character is just being funny. the characters literally doesn't have any chemistry. the scenes where they supposedly bond is so flat and have no emotion whatsoever. fourth, the cgi and visuals, this movie has so many cgi that it doesn't felt real. and i guess people could say well it's a comic book movie of course it doesn't felt real. sure, but the cgi here is not only many and constant, it's also bad. even worst than wonder woman which baffles me since it probably the only thing they could have make better. fifth, the plot. it has so many plot holes, unanswered question, conflict too quickly resolved, predictable moments, obvious plot devices, and so on. i still have many issues with this film, but it's all that i have to say until now. i have some good things to say, though. i mean i appreciate how they reduce some unimportant boring things that they did with bvs. like lois lane and martha kent. they're decently put into the movie, as they supposed to be since they are just supporting characters to superman.
Tough pill to swallow as a fan, this movie was really bad, we waited so long for this movie and it does have some good it but this is THE JUSTICE LEAGUE we deserve so much more. Simply a bad mix of Snyder and Whedon, wait for the DVD and don't get your hopes up too high. The movie was just OK
First things first, it is a better film that B v Superman. But it is obvious that when writer Josh Weldon (former Marvel director for Avengers) took over directing from Zack Synder the movie changed. You can literally see when this happens in the film. It starts off like a Synder DC movie, all dark and trying too hard to take itself way too seriously, then half way through the characters start joking with each other and the movie injects some relief. But its disjointed at best. The problem with DC universe on film is Zack and the control he has. Marvel is brilliant because they have oversight and provides a big picture platform, but they let aspiring directors (lots of them) take some risk and the result is unique fun films. This movie proves DC films will never be on par with Marvel films. Wonder Woman was great, but that was obviously a fluke. The other problem is they just mashed these characters together without time to get to know them. Not worth your hard earned money to see this film. Wait to see it free on an airline, you'll thank me for it.
I don't get how people are enjoying justice league! 鈥��The story is so boring and completely predictable. The cgi oh my god is awful. The villain character has no depth and the heroes are so fake and they're not even funny! Why try so hard dc! Be yourself drama fits u better than comedy you're not marvel. If you don't have the talent to put 2 heroes in one film why go for 5 in one!! you used to do great with standalone stories why ruin it all! so sad.
What I liked1. The acting was great2. The action was good3. The effects were nice4. The character development was goodWhat I didn't like1. The villain was not a good villain at all2. The story line was pretty bad3. The pacing was terribleOverall this was much better than the other movies in the series to this point and it is starting to go down the right path, but not quite there yet. But it is starting to get there.
So after BvsS, I really did not hope much from this movie but was surprised to see each and every scene and the action sequences which I think is the best of all superhero movies. Every single character is in place and has delivered their best performances. This movie is beyond expectations and has set a new record. I don't know why some people are not liking this movie, but for me, it's the best action movie of all time. The drawbacks of BvsS has been kept in mind and have been excellently overcome. Every character has been given attention to. Though the movie was fast that is not a bad thing after all. There is no dull moment in this movie. Thanks DC for making your fans proud!!!!
From the begging to the end I truly enjoyed this movie. The film has gotten negative or mixed reviews but please, do not let that stop you from going to the movies, grabbing a large bucket of popcorn, a massive cup of soda, and enjoying the hell out of this film. Ezra miller to me is a star in this film. He's super enjoyable, he has so much heart and you can tell he had a great time making this film. Ben affleck owns the roll of Batman. He's fantastic. Gal Gadot is brilliant as Wonder Woman. She really is the character. Jason freaking mamoa is a damn stud. He turned the most laughable character into a complete bad ass. His aqua man works and I can't wait to see him in his own film. This is by far the best Superman you are going to see in the current DCEU. He's really making the character his own. He's a good Superman. Just lovable. Story wise the movie does have an issue with pacing, but they are cramming a lot in 2 hours. Wish they would have given some scenes a few more seconds but I know they had obligations. Action in this movie was insanely cool. Watching the flash enter the speed force was IN SANE! All in all watching the team come together and kick some ass was great. The battle between the worlds in the begging was so bad ass. Loved it so damn much. Do yourself a huge favor. See this film!
The movie is really messy and embarrassing. The villain's CGI is so horrible that you feel like you are watching some form of cartoon.There are some good moments within the movie. Especially Superman's interaction with Flash and rest of the team initially was pretty amazing. We kind of see Superman like we have not seen him before. I really loved that part, it was extremely hilarious at the same time. There was really good tension during those scenes. Flash is super amazing. But that was kind of the only good part of the movie. Almost everything else is just crap. The final showdown fight, if you have seen the trailers you have seen most of the best parts. There is so many plot holes within the movie, its amazing how anybody allowed this version of the movie to get released.But I feel its kind of waste of time, to go to the cinemas and watch this. Better to watch once the DVD comes out.
It's really sad to see that this rubbish is churned out by Hollywood , was there a story ? no ! Was it fun to watch ? No was it possible to stay awake throughout the whole film ? No So it's taken $176m at the box office - what does this mean ? There will be plenty more films likes this cause it's where the money seems to be and it's business but it's really sad because people deserve more - there's literally no redeeming feature in this film . Superman films of old with Christopher Reeve were fun , they had humour , the CGI was basic but you believed in them . This was just like watching someone play a computer game over their shoulder there was no attempt to draw you in as a viewer . It's such a shame that after the deserved success of Thor and Guardians of the Galaxy we are back to being dished up this rubbish , there's really no justice ! Don't bother unless you like a film to have no substance whatsoever - waste of time , waste of money , terrible movie . I've heard that Wonder Woman was actually OK, I missed that , no doubt there will be another installment as long it's not called Aquaman vs Wonder Woman I'll give it a go but Inot expecting much after this rubbish ! 0.25/10 Pad.A
"Justice League" is one of the most anticipated for a lot of people. We  have all dreamed of seeing these heroes on the screen for an eternity,  and we finally have it. The DCEU hasn't had a good track record, and  it's no secret that I haven't been too kind to it myself. They're 1 for  4 in my opinion. Now...they're 1 for 5.  I went in giving it a chance. I gave it a chance. I wanted to like it.  It's the Justice League for crying out loud. But it's just not a good  movie.   Everything we hated about BvS is in this movie. They didn't listen.  They try to add some humor into the movie but it doesn't work, and it's  mostly with the Flash. It came across as forced and none of the jokes  were funny. It had some tonal issues, mostly it was a movie trying to  be dark and serious and twisted but then there are attempts at humor  that really throw the movie off its rhythm.   Steppenwolf was a lame villain, with a very generic villain plan. His  plan involves these three boxes that are portals, and he has parademons  and they try to bring about the end of the world and the Justice League  has to stop them. Did i mention beams in the sky yet? His CGI is  atrocious. For a movie with a rumored $300 million dollar budget you  would think the visual effects team would at least try to make it not  look noticeable. it was and it was really distracting. And it wasn't  just Steppenwolf. They do the slo-mo action sequences, which I haven't  been a fan of for a long time, but I understand that is Zack Snyder's  style.   I had heard about the movie being flawed, but fun. I can say I didn't  think it was fun. There were some moments Where I felt I was having fun  but then in the same scenes there was something that just took away  from that fun. Even if the movie wasn't executed properly, which it  wasn't, I wanted to have some fun, and unfortunately I didn't feel as  if I did.  There is some bad editing and cropping too. I noticed some obvious ADR  moments and a lot of the heads were cut off when it came to cropping  scenes.   Characterization is really thin, the plot is thin, there's plot holes  galore thanks to the mandated two hour runtime. This is a band of  superheroes that deserves better than what we got.  I am going to give "Justice League" a D+.
The only good thing about this movie was Henry Cavill's scenes when he was topless. Danny Elfman's score was great as usual! Even the Gotham TV series is better than this.I think DC should stay at stand alone movies of their heroes cause when they put them together it's a total disaster.
.... the level of character development, story line and special effects of Destroy All Monsters?The CGI is bad! You notice a certain person has bad CGI around his upper lip. Because his commitment to his role was on par with Cesar Romero. You couldn't grow that thing back in a few weeks?I'm reading a lot reviews with the attitude of everybody deserves a trophy, when the reviews aren't downright condemning. There's a lot of mention of the troubles during the shooting. I don't give a damn! Also a lot of the high mark reviews are by the typical just joined IMDb to write THIS REVIEW, and you'll never see me again.(phony)look at the difference between IMDb and Rotten Tomatoes! How can there be that big a difference? I'll tell you how, fans can manipulate IMDb, that's how! How can people justify giving this high marks, and then explain all the misfires, and they did it on the hopes NEXT TIME they'll do better? I mean seriously, read about 20 reviews by people who rate it highly and you'll see they admit they over rated it within the review.You've had several shots at this now DC/Warners. Was Wonder Woman a blip on the radar? The villain has no personality! I'm just here for the mayhem, and the buffet. I see several people give this 3 stars for a few nice panels. Really that's enough for you, a few nice hero poses? This is literally the short bus version of a major blockbuster! Sure it's going to do Batman vrs Superman numbers, but is that what they were shooting for?
Absolutely disappointed, the movie lacked any depth and felt like a sequence of scenes designed solely to set up to future stand alone movies for the so called heroes from Justice league. The movie lacked any depth and all dialog consisted mainly of one liners and sad attempts to get some laughs. DC simply can't match Marvel and I think that is a shame since they have such rich material to work with. I think in future I will give DC movies a miss.
I've just watched the Justice League movie this afternoon and I totally enjoyed it! It's amazing out of my expectation because I was influenced by bad reviews from some sites like Rotten Tomatoes. Now I know they were wrong! The only thing I have to complain is that I wish the movie could be longer. ( I would give the movie 9.5/10 on IMDb but 9.5 doesn't exist so I chose 10) I love the superheroes, great chemistry between them! I love Batman and Wonder Woman so much! The Flash is very cute but it's not true that he steals the show. Actually, all 6 heroes steal the show! All of them are very attractive and lively! I don't know what the others think but today all of the audience in the cinema was satisfied and applauded excitedly. Now I'm still excited and I know I will watch it at least two more times. From now on, I know I will never trust the critics again. We must watch it ourselves because we pay for the tickets, not the critics
After watching BvS I have not expected much on this sequel. Surprise, it is a bit better than the loud and noisy BvS. But still has some elements from it.Better character development (Josh Whedon ?), fight scenes still look like video game scenes, some scenes are rushed to be shrunk in an 2-hours movie,... The Villain is boring. After hiring Eisenberg as Lex Luthor, Cara Delevingne in Suicide Squad (not related to her BTW), the DCEU is still continuing with plain and boring villains.Conclusion: a bit messy.Not the film of the year but improvement from BvS but not enough to be attached to the characters.
This movie is a two hour long visual orgy with absolutely no story behind it. You could write all of it down on a napkin with a blunt crayon. The CGI is way overdone, the physics ridiculous - just like in Wonder Woman -, the action gets boring fast, and since there is no story, there are no plot twists, no surprises, no character development, nothing. Just CGI characters fighting different CGI characters in a predictable succession of different scenes, the end.This movie is missing three quarters of what make a movie a movie and the last quarter is not without its own faults, as aforementioned. In short, it's a complete fail.
The characters they introduce in the movie don't get much backstory, which might be due to the fact that Warner Brothers required this movie to be two hours exactly. They try to make the tone of this film less dark by adding in jokes, many of which didn't really land for me. Some one-liners they have in this film are kind of cheesy, like when Cyborg says "boo-yah" after beating the para demons and when Superman says "I like justice", it just felt weird at times. The CGI looked kind of cheap at times, especially on the villain Steppenwolf, who looked like a video game character. I also thought 2012 CGI on the Chitauri in the Avengers looked way better than the CGI on the para demons in this movie. Especially in the finale of the movie with the red sky, this movie looked like a video game a lot, and the action was chaotic and hard to follow. I also thought the heroes were sort of helpless before Superman arrived to beat down Steppenwolf, Wonder Woman especially was underpowered in this film. At least it's better in tone than Batman vs. Superman and a bit funnier than Suicide Squad.
This is a direct sequel to BVS and was clearly supposed to be direct continuation of that story and style. Editing is a mess, especially in the first act. The entire film seems to be cobbled together by cutting down a very serious 3 1/2 hour epic movie into a brisk 2 hour ride. Clunky "cute-funny" dialogue and scenes that don't fit with the rest of this "epic" film Some CGI blunders: see S-man upper lip and weird purple rootsHalf of the footage from the trailers didn't make the final cut (not necessarily a bad thing but I find it distracting at points)
Seeing one of the greatest superhero team ever on a big screen is the biggest childhood fantasy for many. Oh well! Then you must be sorry to witness this movie. The humor was a mess and the plot and dialogues were too slow and yes you guessed it, this movie again mourned for the death of Superman for almost 15 minutes! Come on you already mourned for him for 30 minutes in the last movie.There's no character developer, no touching verses and nothing that would make the movie worth a watch.For Aquaman and Batman fans, "Sorry to say that it's such a worst time for you to live in this planet". Batman was nothing but a pathetic human whose incapable of doing anything, even driving a plane or car or whatever. It's more like this Batman didn't even had a working brain of a normal human with poor planning skills. He's just plain stupid, and Aquaman does nothing but discouraging others, a frightened guy and a dude who can't even fight properly underwater but just jumps here and there on air sometimes. There was a good tension building up towards climax only to be ruined completely making it a joke. * WARNING SPOILER ALERT:*Long story short: Announcing everyone that Superman is dead, showing how hopeless this world is without Superman and how everyone is trying to cope up without Superman, villain sees death of Superman as an opportunity and invades the world that's without Superman, Other dummy heroes tries to fight and fails pathetically, Batman plans to resurrect Superman but ridiculed and even beaten up by his teammates for that. However they resurrect him he then beats everyone (and only just throws Batman off but Batsy takes up a heavy damage, OH POOR BATSY) and flies away. While every other dummy heroes tries their best to fight off Steppenwolf (Batman does nothing by the way, he's more like a supporting cast during this fight) when all hope is lost Superman comes and saves the day without a sweat. What an amazing plot! Gosh! Everyone thank Zack Snyder for turning our childhood fantasy into a nightmare yet again.
JUSTICE LEAGUE An honest and insightful review by Navin NambiarI've waited for this movie for 16 years. Yes, 16 years聟cause that's when the Justice League animated series started airing on Cartoon Network. It was my favorite cartoon. I mean my absolute favorite cartoon. Do you get me? I'm also a fan of nostalgia and when I heard that Danny Elfman's classic Batman theme &amp; John Williams' score from Richard Donner's Superman (1978) was going to be featured, I was over the moon. My mind was just filled with countless ideas and opportunities of how they could capitalize on those themes and conjure up some truly epic mind-boggling scenes.Unfortunately, that's where I let myself down. Those epic scenes will forever remain a figment of my imagination. SIGH.As for the movie itself, the story was too rushed in my opinion. The apparent WB corporate directive of keeping the movie shorter than 2hours seems to have done a lot of damage to the flow of the film. Not that 30mins more would make that big of a difference, but I can almost guarantee you that the director's cut will be slightly better. This is especially sad for me since in the comics, DC usually churn out great, very well written story lines. Here, not so much. The movie lacked any depth and all dialog consisted mainly of one liners and sad attempts to get some laughs. I don't have a problem with humor, but the humor in this movie is so forced it became cringe-worthy. Too many "let's copy Marvel" funnies about it.If this had come out 10 years ago, it would have been pretty great, nowadays we expect more, want more, deserve more, and with this talent and all the money spent they should have produced a lot better movie.So summarize, Justice League is an okayish Superhero movie. I'm gonna sell the two Hot Toys characters that I've pre-ordered. They don't deserve a place in my cabinet. I miss Christopher Nolan and his Batman Series. I'm disappointed :(
Can't quite call myself a true fan of superhero movies, but I am fond of both Marvel and DC. To me, Justice League was a major disappointment.For the past 5 years DC has been desperately trying to jump-start their universe, while Marvel was already on a roll with no intention of stopping. Although, it doesn't seem to work for DC. With the negative reviews of Batman v Superman, the burden of setting the DCEU on the right path has fallen to Justice League. It did set the universe on a path, but is it the right one, it remains to be seen. The simple fact is that there's still that problem with a huge amount of action and poor distribution of it.As for the characters... I can't yet come to terms of Ben Affleck being the Caped Crusader and Superman's appearance was just not impressive enough. I found The Flash to be quite irritating and I'm indifferent when it comes to Cyborg.If you ask me, what could have been saved of the Justice League was saved by Gal Gadot as Wonder Woman and Jason Momoa as Aquaman. Also, some of the details in the battle scenes were spot on and so were some of the jokes (I repeat SOME).To sum up, I can say that Justice League is worth watching, but prepare for a certain feeling of missing something in the end. I can't put my finger on it, but the ending just hits you out of the bloom, therefore something is left unsaid. It will be interesting to see the development of DCEU after Justice League, but I'm afraid it is headed nowhere. Let's hope I'm wrong.
You have to feel sorry for DC Comics.Sure they've made more than a bucket load of cash with many of their releases, including of course this year's box office behemoth and critical darling Wonder Woman, but overall the company has been living in the shadows of Marvel for a number of years now and have been late to the party when it comes to superhero team-up events until now.Suffering a troubled production that saw original director Zack Snyder depart the project late in the piece due to a family tragedy and replaced by Avenger's mastermind Joss Whedon, Justice League has had a far from smooth run to cinemas, that includes the fact we've never truly been properly introduced to its new main players, Aquaman, The Flash and Cyborg, with DC keen to get this ensemble together as quickly as possible.Considering all of this, Justice League is not what I'd call a "bad" movie, in the sense that I'd warn everyone against seeing it, but this often jumbled and sometimes just not that interesting blockbuster is still far from the all-round winner DC would've been hoping for with Snyder and Whedon's film lacking both a genuinely good story arc (new villain Steppenwolf is just generic baddie 101 or even worse) and any true memorable set-pieces or set-ups.At what feels like a fairly brisk 120 minute runtime, Justice League is always on the move as we initially get to witness the first meetings between this collection of new friends (the highlight of which is probably Ezra Miller's pizza eating Barry Allen/The Flash) but with so many people, so many different arcs to play out, Snyder and Whedon struggle to bring it all home and action scenes often feel haphazard, some scenes feel rushed or unwanted (a Russian family is given far too much screen time), while all the films colourful characters don't get the airtime they perhaps needed.After the middling response so far to his take on Batman, Affleck won't be gaining or losing too many supporters here, the verdict is well and truly still out on Cavill's take on Superman, while Gadot is once again great as Wonder Woman. Of the new cast Miller is a fine addition as the awkward Allen, Jason Momoa gives fans hope that his standalone Aquaman will be a lot of fun, while it's surprising just how affecting Ray Fisher is as Cyborg even if his character doesn't seem cut out to get his own standalone feature.It's a shame then that we don't ever feel like this team is given the scenarios they needed to really gel together. There's chemistry to be found here, even Cavill and Affleck benefit from the likes of Gadot and the new additions, their rather tiresome portrayals enlivened by the fresh, energetic nature of their co-stars but overall the film lacks an energy or pizazz that would've been the kicker to elevate this genuine middle of the road experience to something else entirely.Final Say 聳 All in all huge fans of DC will be kept happy with this sometimes enjoyable, sometimes downright bad big screen culmination of hero's and one badly CGI'd and generic villain.Devoid of anything of true note and without a memorable set-piece, Justice League is unquestionably the poor cousin of The Avenger's but with the talented cast involved, there is enough hope here to suggest that this band of hero's have some room to grow into something special if all the stars align.2 1/2 terrorised Russian families out of 5
Imagine history backwards. Imagine that you were lucky enough to watch the Edward J. Olmos' version of Battlestar Galactica first, and then, after a while, they came back with the Lorne Green's version of it. That's exactly what happened with this Marvel-infected version of the Justice League.Gone is the brooding menace of what people with these special skills would harbor in real life. Gone is the sense of peril when you have the whole world at risk of being destroyed by god-like forces. Gone is the beauty of imagination beyond what Marvel would ever deliver.This is a parody of what the DCEU gave us before.We were THAT close to have a Justice League movie worthy of being called art; instead, we got another forgettable Marvel movie.Thanks for what you gave us, Mr. Snyder.Shame on you, Weldon, for ruining the art of bringing comic books to life.
justice league animated series was my favourite. and justice league flash point paradox is my favorite superhero movie after the dark knight. but this zack snyder movie was not good at all. .. 1. Alfred-"they said you would come, i hope its not too late" me and my friend had a bet, who is Alfred is talking too, superman or GL, but guess what ? They never showed this scene. . 2. i was hoping for green lantern cameo or something epic. but only suspense in movie was superman's return, which is obvious. . 3. darkseid? they never showed him. . 4. The villain? after general zord then doomsday what we got in justice league? weakest villain ever, superman didn't took a punch from him, while doomsday was able to beat him. . 5. If superman is more powerful than ww, aquaman and cyborg combined and also as fast as flash then why you need a team? . 6. the ending? opening was good, middle part was better but ending? superman just came and beat the hell out of villain and paradeamons were like krybots of power ranger(completely useless) . 7. Batman's dream in bvs? I thought they will show here- "listen to me, lois is the key" what happened to that segment? . so overall i am disappointed, they reduced showtime to just 110 minutes, didn't showed many scenes which were in trailer itself. .so stop fooling yourself.my all 4 friend were angry at me, due to this movie. We need something better from DC than a strait laced movie.
An entirely forgettable affair in every sense of the word, Justice League fails to setup any further direction to the DC world-building than a slow descend back to camp where it was after Tim Burton's Batman movies 25 years ago. Nolan's years at helm are certainly far away by now.The bafflingly conventional, illogical and randomly jumping story doesn't have a single unexpected turn of events and instead treads waters that have been trod many times before and with greater success. The CGI is strangely haphazard, with very little care how it stands out when scenes are edited together. Steppenwolf is an eye-wateringly bad villain, becoming a clumsy scarecrow whose motivations and powers come and go.Actors are an uneven bunch, both as characters and as talents, and fail to generate camaraderie or chemistry. Ezra Miller is so much better as an actor than the rest that he becomes a distraction by reminding us about it constantly. Every time his delivery elevates the poor material, it turns against the movie when the next one who opens his mouth only looks cringe-worthy.
What would you do if three out of four films in your blockbuster superhero franchise aren't particularly good? When going forward with the fifth film (the all-important one that ties everything together and launches it into the stratosphere), do you stick with what you know? Or do you try to learn from the outpouring of love and acclaim that greeted Wonder Woman, the outlying fourth film? Do you add more humour and a dash of fun to the generally dark, dour proceedings? Do you refine your script to focus a little more on character and less on bombastic spectacle? In the case of Justice League, the answers 聳 and corresponding results 聳 are mixed. (Kinda, kinda, yes, kinda, by the way.) Justice League opens in the wake of Superman's (Cavill) death. The world 聳 and his erstwhile frenemy Bruce Wayne/Batman (Affleck) 聳 are in a dark depression. But cataclysmic sieges on a planetary scale wait for no man (or woman). Steppenwolf (played by Hinds via motion-capture), an ancient, alien evil that once tried to claim Earth as his own, has returned with an army of fear-fuelled parademons. Bruce realises that, without Superman as the first and best line of defense, he needs to assemble a team (a 'justice league', as it were) to save the world.Consequently, the first half of the film is rather exposition-heavy, as it busily sets up its characters, relationships and stakes. Bruce reunites with Diana Prince/Wonder Woman (Gadot), just as she's begun to step out from beneath the shadow of grief. We also get to know the other potential League members that we've only glimpsed in passing 聳 snarky speedster Barry Allen/Flash (Miller); sassy fish-whisperer Arthur Curry/Aquaman (Momoa); and surly human machine Victor Stone/Cyborg (Fisher).Thankfully, Justice League isn't as relentlessly dark and joy-free as director Zack Snyder's previous entries in the DCEU. While there's nothing wrong with going full grim when putting superheroes on screen (Christopher Nolan's Dark Knight trilogy proved that you could do so with depth, flair and intelligence to burn), Snyder's Man Of Steel and Batman Vs. Superman were curiously bleak pictures. Stuffed with bombastic spectacle and testosterone- charged face-offs, both films were more or less dreadful, displaying a fundamental misunderstanding of their main characters. (Cavill's broody Superman, in particular, is a painfully misguided interpretation of DC Comics' most iconic superhero, a literal and figurative beacon of light.) In contrast, there's a brighter vein of hope and humour threaded throughout Justice League, though it's unclear just how much of that can be credited directly to Snyder. The main reason for that is the involvement of Joss Whedon, who wrote and directed Marvel's two enormously successful and largely acclaimed Avengers films. Initially brought on to doctor the script, Whedon wound up overseeing post- production on the film (including significant reshoots), after Snyder chose to take some time off for very sad personal reasons.Without question, the final film benefits from the injection of Whedon's signature banter and his ability to effectively juggle multiple character narratives. Whether it's Barry and Victor bonding in a graveyard or Arthur's big speech before the final battle, Whedon contributes some of the most purely fun 聳 and funny 聳 moments in the DCEU to date.Characters and relationships, though more sketched than fleshed out, work well enough. As the film progresses, each member of the fledgling League works out who they want to be, as people and as the earth's self-appointed defenders. The newcomers are all decent, though not quite the breakout successes the studio is no doubt hoping for. Miller's Flash starts out adorable but ends up annoying. Momoa is underserved by the script, but nails the swagger. With just half his face to work with, Fisher amps up the angst while buried beneath some oddly ugly character design.As for DC's Big Three, it can be tough to buy into Diana's decades-long descent into grief following the character-defining climax of Wonder Woman. But, given that her arc is necessarily dictated by earlier narrative decisions, Gadot finds some lovely emotional beats to play as Diana chooses to lead and share her light with the world. The film also nudges the hitherto badly-botched relationship between the late Superman and Lois Lane (Amy Adams, still criminally underused) in a better direction.The biggest surprise of Justice League is how Affleck's Batman 聳 almost rabidly xenophobic in Batman Vs. Superman 聳 grounds both the film and the team. There's something hauntingly poetic about watching this taciturn loner, who could so easily hide himself away in a fortress of wealth and power, trying to atone for the world's loss of Superman. Embracing the fact that he's by far the most mortal member of the League, the film finds the heroism in Batman's humanity.For all that it gets right, though, Justice League suffers for being what it largely still is: a Snyder blockbuster. He tends to favour overblown spectacle and one-dimensional villains, both of which culminate in the peculiarly unmenacing Steppenwolf 聳 a CGI-drenched creation that manages to be hammy and fake all at once. The plot is, somehow, stupidly convoluted and insultingly simple at the same time. ('Mother Boxes' must be another way of spelling 'MacGuffin'.) And, while absolutely everything about this film is better than what Snyder has produced before, it still never quite grabs the heart.Nonetheless, Justice League is a step in the right direction. It doesn't reach the glorious heights of Wonder Woman, but it doesn't regress to the murky depths of Batman Vs. Superman either. With its story and characters turned firmly towards the light, there might be hope for this franchise yet.
So after seeing Batman vs Superman, I didn't exactly have high hopes for this film. The trailer, particularly, with it's sacrilegious abomination cover of the Beatles' Come Together, gave me mixed feelings about it.DC have been playing catch-up with Marvel for ages, and it really shows. Half of the Justice League have already been introduced from previous films. The others (Aquaman, the Flash, and Cyborg) are given their proper debut here (no, I'm not counting their brief cameos in the other films) and the film does its best to integrate them into the story. The film is your standard 'evil overlord tries to take over the world' plot, with Batfleck trying to assemble the Justice League. The team have some funny lines occasionally, which I feel is thanks to Joss Whedon being one of the screenwriters, but once again, the Zack Snyder tropes come to the surface with numerous sped up/slo-mo action scenes. There were also a few lines of dialogue that made me cringe.The film overall is enjoyable but there are pacing issues. The villain of the piece is particularly forgettable. They try to build this sense of scale that looks grand and epic but ultimately it doesn't quite live up to the hype, in my opinion.If we're talking about wasted potential, how about JK Simmons as Commissioner Gordon? I really hope he has more time to shine in future films because he had no reason to be in this film other than establishing his presence in the DC Universe. Also, speaking of wasted talent/useless characters, Amy Adams as Lois Lane... I swear to God, her character development is halted in its tracks beyond simply 'I love Superman'. It's ridiculous.That aside, the main heroes perform well here. I particularly enjoyed Ezra Miller's interpretation of the Flash. Jason Momoa is just awesome in everything. Gal Gadot is great as Wonder Woman, yet again, Ray Fisher makes a good Cyborg (I found it ironic that his Dad was the actor who played Miles Dyson in Terminator 2) and Ben Affleck continues to be great as Bruce Wayne.Not terrible, not fantastic, but it's in the healthy middle ground for me.
*minor SPOILERS*Usually I give movies a solid 5 on the start, meaning that the movie is average, but this.... was a bummer.The plot line is messy, sequences and scenes are just happening without any order. Moreover, the character development and buildup is disappointing. The Villlan in this movie is exactly the same as in the Wonder woman, weird, not meaningful...it is just there.Jason Momoa kicked ass though, and there were a few moments, where the movie wasn't boring, but man....some scenes make you just look at your watch and check the time. Overall lack of chemistry between characters, and I was so excited to see the movie. The flash character is just too much cringy*hey-look-at-me-I'm-a-socially-awkward guy". He's basically the spiderman of DC universe...In general, if you really want to see the movie, don't waste your money, wait until it comes out on netflix.
This was an amazing movie. These so called "critics" got it wrong. It was phenomenal. Fun ride from start to finish. Superman was the perfect garnish to a great stew of amazing characters. He came at the exactly the right moment, not stealing the thunder of other heroes. well balanced. the team dynamic was amazing. You could see how superman's death had caused evolution of Diana and Bruce. you can see how the flash isn't perfect and is just a kid starting out. loved this. better than any of the marvel movies this year( FYI I loved all of them except Thor Ragnarok,(comedy on point, but nothing else)).
A disappointing movie (or maybe a terrible cut of a movie). Man of Steel was a pretty decent movie, specially if we take into account what they were trying to do with the Superman character. It had coherence, sobriety and even some degree of philosophical and socio-political thought, not to mention good acting (even with all the action and special effects on screen). And let's not forget that the young Clark Kent character was a reader of Plato and that we could enjoy Hans Zimmer epic music throughout the movie (just to mention two very interesting aspects). Batman v. Superman wasn't as good as expected, considering the very awaited clash between the Bat-Man and the Super-Man, but I admit it would be difficult to convey the idea that Batman could last more than one or two rounds against Superman (even with the kryptonite weapons). Nevertheless, it was a movie that made some sense, despite the extremely weak plot surrounding Lex Luthor's plans to set off a battle between the two main characters: I mean, he is portrayed as a very intelligent man, but Bruce Wayne, as a detective, would have been able to figure out who sent him those newspaper cuts and that it was all an evil plan. Ben Affleck was a total surprise. Probably some of his best acting. His Batman was dark, sober, cunning, violent (reminding me a lot of the initial versions of Batman) and mature 聳 a common man who had to rise to the occasion in order to protect the world from a very serious threat (an alien one), potentially apocalyptic. I mean, I think it's remarkable that a mere mortal (as heroic as he may be) faces an enhanced kryptonian and says: "Tell me. Do you bleed?" And Superman's death, though not epic, was emotional. Justice League, on the other hand, made very little sense or no sense at all. There's a great number of aspects that I could mention, but I'll just focus on the characters and their development, to keep it short and to the point: Batman: no longer the earth's defender who suffered from cold sweat thinking about the possibility that his worst nightmares would become true. Ben Affleck changed his own interpretation of Batman completely (or the writers did). It didn't work. Wonder Woman: same as before, although kind of disappointing considering her time on screen. Aquaman: I don't know what happened. They were able to turn an usually uninteresting character, though serious, haughty and noble, into a teenage joker in the body of a 38 year old man, who is also kind of a surfer. It's a character that we don't get to know at all and that has no depth. In fact, he's kind of an idiot. Flash: the comic relief. But it didn't have to be. They chose to depict him as a young man; that's fine, but that doesn't mean he has to be a wide open eyes goofball all the time. We understand there's something going on in his life, with the mother and father background, but we don't actually get to know him. Cyborg: a surprise. Also a stranger to us, but still a surprise. His mopey, melancholic and dark character was well balanced and made sense: he died and came back as something he still doesn't quite understand yet; his comprehension of the world and of himself is constantly changing due to the power of the box, and it shows. Steppenwolf: a dummy. Nothing more. He was just bits and pieces of light on screen. They could have replaced him with any other "puppet" that it would not have made a difference. We don't actually know his motivations (it's all very superficial), where he comes from, what he wants, his level of power (looks very menacing at first, but then it fades away). Superman: probably the biggest disappointment after Batman. His comeback was supposed to be extremely emotional and thrilling. Instead, it was predictable, announced and too fast. There wasn't a build up. They were actually able to destroy the "savior trope" with him. He saved the day, true, but in a very blend and lukewarm way. Finally, let me just mention the fact that the movie was sometimes kind of corny. Just remember the scene where they are all standing together on top of that building and those little flowers are growing... This is the Justice League, not a group of boy scouts. I really hope they take things slow the next time around and are able to actually build it up instead of building it down like they did. This may be evidence that having that many good and famous directors, producers and writers is a recipe for disaster.
First of all a disclaimer, I only sat in for the first hour of the movie. After that I simply couldn't be bothered to watch any more. My rating is based on the first part - it might have picked up tremendously during the second part, but I don't imagine what could have happened during that part to justify a 7.3 on IMDb.On a side note, I have watched a ton of JL the animated shows, so I feel I know the characters pretty well.I felt that everything was centered around special effects. The story, I felt, had no real cohesion and it seemed to jump around all over the place. They try to put in a bit of backstory for some of the characters but it's so shallow it doesn't matter.Affleck does a good job as Batman, as does Gadot for WW. However there is absolutely zero chemistry between Wayne/Batman and Alfred. The flash is too much of a comic relief. As he himself says he has no combat training or anything, and is afraid of everything basically. Where in the world did he get that suit from?? Cyborg is by far the worst character, Momoa as Aquaman is not a whole lot better.
If Batman V Superman is the oozing, puss-filled, body wound to the DCEU than Justice League is the haphazardly applied bandage that's currently dressing it. It works at least as far as mitigating the damage, stopping the bleeding and keeping this ugly-looking spectacle alive, but it's not exactly the miracle cure for the mountains of ills currently plaguing the DCEU that fans were hoping for. What exactly does that make Suicide Squad; I don't know, probably the gangrene? Seemingly only a couple of weeks since the death of Superman, Bruce Wayne and Diana Prince aka Batman and Wonder Woman preemptively team-up to protect the world from external threat. To help them, they recruit young upstarts Barry Allen and Victor Stone aka The Flash and Cyborg; as well as marine demigod Arthur Curry aka Aquaman. This is so they can face down the eventual threat of the sinister Steppenwolf and his army of fear-fueled creatures from places unknown aka some inter-dimensional/space traveling hypno-beam (the film is not clear on this point).Starting with the good, the films as-of-yet introduced superheroes are interesting enough characters handled with the best of care by their actors. Miller especially does an excellent job keeping the mirth coming while staying true to the spirit and tone of The Flash and movie respectively. Momoa straight up shows up as Momoa sans the dreads but the rock star bravado he's known for works and works well all things considered. Fisher pulls double duty as a near constant fountain of exposition as well as a living breathing character worth investing in. It doesn't always work given the paragraphs worth of beans he needs to spill but at least no one is calling him the professor yet.The brightest star however is Gadot whose stunning beauty and otherworldly accent perfectly encapsulates every superficial thing we love about Wonder Woman. On a deeper level, Diana's naivet茅 from the fondly revered Wonder Woman movie is gone, but what's still there is an inner strength that both serves to ground this movie, while being an understandable progression of a character now centuries old.The fact that Wonder Woman is the only character worth not just caring for but believing in should be an indication of what's the biggest problem with this movie. Even with the Batman in the mix, the stitched-together cadre feels less like the world's mightiest heroes and more like a League of Extraordinary Gentlemen. They're given just enough time to go over their skill set and motivations but its all bullet points and untrimmed fat that at times derails the film's pacing. Take a scene transition early on where Bruce Wayne is buttering up Aquaman. This scene is then set against Wonder Woman's action-packed introduction, an edit that arguably works on a narrative level but feels jammed in there like a Janis Joplin tune played just after a cover of "Come Together".What's worse, Justice League always seems to be in a rush to get somewhere guaranteeing moments of depth and exposition stick out harshly against the action. Bruce Wayne jets here and there, Steppenwolf picks a fight with the Amazons and the Atlantians, Wonder Woman comes swooping through a terrorist plot etc. It's all action-packed in its own bruising, unremarkable way, but none of it is good at conveying information, establishing stakes or forwarding the plot.Luckily the plot is so simple as to ensure the slow bits are over quickly. Evil-because-he's-evil Steppenwolf wants all the shiny cubes and our protagonists are doing everything in their power to stop him. That's basically it, a first draft good versus evil macguffin hunt that seems to be avoiding themes from the other films until a certain subplot makes it impossible. It doesn't add anything to the genre that they're fighting the third DC villain in five movies with a horned helmet on some power trip about world destruction but at least it makes sense this time around.And before you go huffing and puffing about how the complex mythology behind Superman, Darkseid and the infinite Earth crisis is justification for the repetitiveness; you need to first read the forthcoming sentence aloud and slowly. Movies do not require homework! Knowing the larger purpose and machinations of a motherbox is no more an indication of this movies quality than reading The Dark Knight Returns retroactively makes BvS not a pile of garbage. Enough makes sense this time around but it's still repetitive.And can we take a moment to talk about Batfleck again? I was very loudly not a fan of his older, reactionary Batman in BvS but since that movie was such a dumpster fire, I was willing to give everyone involved a mulligan so long as this one was at least passable. It is, but the poor man still looks like a bewildered stepfather who won the part in a raffle and continues wearing the cowl because his stepson finally thinks he's cool. It's just not a good use of your Affleck. Affleck is good for two things: being an a**hole and being a quiet blank slate a la his character in Argo. Batman is neither of those things but thanks to Affleck he comes across as both. Not something you want for the founder of the Justice League.A reported $25 million worth of reshoots, the unexpected absence of director Zack Snyder due to personal reasons and a shaky foundation built upon the most hated franchise movie to come out since Batman &amp; Robin; it's actually kind of impressive this thing didn't turn out worse. It's not up to the level of another team-up movie that shall remain nameless but at least with Justice League, DC and Warner Bros. prove they're slowly learning from their mistakes. I admire this movie, I really do, but to the extent that I'd admire a fat guy running a marathon. It's trying; it's just too ill-prepared and bloated to do the job efficiently.
Definitely better than bvs. However, considering the triumph that was wonder woman, this is a major step down! There is so many things Justice league can't get right and that just adds to the awkwardness. Eg. A visibly old batman who lacks charisma (ben looks so uncomfortable playing bruce wayne as well), a dorky and annoying flash (I get it, hes trying to be the comic relief..just don't try too hard) as well as a style over substance aquaman. Its not all bad though, despite that is was mildly fun. Cyborg, wonder woman and superman were great! Yes...even superman. He finally smiled! The standouts definitely are cyborg and wonder woman. As for the forgotten...well let me see...oh yes! The villain! What the heck? What a lame villain. He looks like a sea shell. A mollusk. Not scary at all and he cant even enunciate properly! "What the heck are you saying if you have a tongue use it!" All i hear him say is "mother". That word never makes a villain like like a bad-ass. The story was..meh.So I'll give this movie a 5.555/10. Twas pretty forgettable.
Another DC tragedy is ahead.This movie is definitely worse than Man of steel.But slightly better than BvS.So this is another failure for DC.No wonder DC embargoed rotten tomatoes to announce the score on this Thursday The pacing,bad developed characters,cringe and cheesy moments,forced comedy,CGI,villains etc.. are all bad.One of the worst movies I have ever seen in this genre
After years of speculation and uncertainty, DC Films' answer to Marvel's Avengers is finally here. But is it necessary? Fans, movie pundits, studio suits and everyone else in between can argue over this for years. The answer is irrelevant, and given the outcome, even rhetorical. As awkward as it sounds, Justice League - with no less than five latex clad superheroes - is the finale to director Zack Snyder's trilogy (following Man of Steel and Batman Versus Superman) but also distances itself from the previous two by trying to fix common complaints about those films - too dark and no spunk, we said. Well guess what; The makers behind Justice League heard our protests and made this film as bright as day. There's also some humour that will draw a genuine smirk from all but the sternest viewer or harshest critic. That's it. Everything else is an incoherent, incomplete, unguided, unwanted mess. The problems are plenty because that mess is all over the place. On one level, the world is still mourning the death of Superman. Like the previous film, Biblical analogies are apparent, but only if you care to look below the surface and only if you know what to look for; which is why a genuine question in this film is whether or not a God can be resurrected, and if so, should that happen. Then the tone shifts to familiar territory. On another level, the planet is about to be destroyed by Steppenwolf (played by Ciar谩n Hinds by bizarrely imitating Liam Neeson), an alien general done up with bad CGI. And then there is Bruce Wayne who claims his superhero ability is being rich. If that isn't a stab at Tony Stark, is it meant to be funny? After hobbling along with these one-liners for an hour, the titular roster is setup for the first and bombastic clash of superpowers. But by this time we are essentially watching two movies, and it won't take long before it dawns on the viewer that something isn't quite right. Or not altogether there. Even as alarming as that sounds, there is yet another movie which struggles to break through the superficial cracks of the main movie, and this is probably why Justice League is almost forgivable - The idea of a team of misfits trying to fit, (which made The Avengers hugely entertaining) seems to find some footing in this film too. Ezra Miller's Barry Allen, AKA The Flash, holds a candle to Tom Holland's Peter Parker. For better or worse, Miller even has a lot more pep than Ben Affleck's Bruce Wayne and Batman combined! Another welcome addition is Jason Momoa as the brooding Aquaman, and although there's something fishy about his supersonic speed, there's not much else explored.When it works, it's because of the camaraderie between some of the characters. Along with Miller's Flash, Gal Gadot's Wonder Woman is almost always one of them. Consistency, though, is not a strong point in this film. In the end, and despite being salvageable, Justice League is content with breeding familiarity. This includes a villain that is both weak and boring, and with an agenda that we have seen one too many times. As for Ray Fisher's Cyborg, there's little doubt that anyone will remember how and why he is a member of the League. While all this is still forgivable given Snyder's tragic personal loss during filming, the biggest undoing is a superhero film unsure of what it wants to be. Which again asks 聳 was this necessary?
The movie has a very good pace, thanks to its straightforward narrative/plot. The chemistry between all the characters (including Simmons, Irons, Adams &amp; Lane) is amazing, and I think we have to thank both Snyder and Wheddon for it. I was a bit worried about how the score would fit the finished product, but at the end it all fit perfectly.There are lots of memorable scenes/moments and small details that really put a smile on my face.What about that awesome Batman scene? I hope Affleck comes back for a third movie, whatever that movie might be, because his performance was amazing, IMHO. This was the natural evolution for his character, coming out from the dark place where he was at the beginning of BvS and become the hero he once was. I loved the Bruce/Alfred interactions in BvS, and JL keeps that going. The scenes with Gordon are also great, Simmons does a great job.Gal keeps doing an amazing work as Diana/Wonder Woman, and I think by now, even the most avid naysayers have to admit that. The interactions between Diana/Wonder Woman and Bruce/Batman are also a highlight. Wish the scene we saw in the first teaser, when they talk about Aquaman, was in the movie.As for the newcomers: they all did an amazing job. I was impressed with Ray Fisher's Victor/Cyborg throughout the movie, and that scene at the end when he changes his armor to the more classic armor from the comics was perfect. Momoa is a bad-ass Aquaman, period. Can't wait to see more of him (and Mera) in the solo movie. Since the beginning we all knew that Barry/The Flash would be one of the lighter elements of the movie, and he works perfectly. Great performance as both Barry and The Flash, with great interactions with all the team members. The scenes with his dad added something else to his character. The super speed FX were top notch. Steppenwolf served his purposed, and despite being full CGI, it worked well, IMHO. I wasn't expecting a villain with deep motivations or big explanations for his actions. He tried to invade Earth and he got beat up, so he came back for round 2. That's more than enough so set things in motion and to get the team together. Loved when he said "For Darkseid!".Now, Superman. His character arc came full circle in Justice League. He no longer is the rookie on his first day on the job, and no longer is the troubled hero unsure about his actions. I know people criticized his characterization in MoS and BvS, but all of that was needed to get him where he stands now: he is Superman. In a movie where the Mother Boxes are a central elements, it makes sense that they used their power to bring him back. Loved that clash between him and the others, specially when Barry sees that Superman is aware of him coming fast. And then it all comes to Lois: she's the key. I wish they had given at least 10 more minutes to explore Superman's return and that the scene in the farm had included the lines about the ring. In the final showdown everyone sees the confident Superman doing what he does best: serving justice.The mid and post-credits scenes: the first one is clearly for the fans, and the second one really puts the cherry on top of the cake. It was great to see Lex again, even if it was just for a few seconds. Everyone in the movie theater went crazy when they saw Deathstroke!Justice League is one hell of a ride, from beginning to end. Sure, it feels a bit short, but that's far from being a problem. I hope the Blu-ray includes some of the scenes left out from the theatrical cut.
Amazing Experience! I felt the movie good have been a bit more longer to give space to the heroes to build their backstories. But thanks to the WB mandate of keeping the film within 2hours might have caused the backlash. I would now definitely wait for the extended version.One takeaway from the film for me was Superman! He was great and the best. He is the Superman we were all longing for. Even the mightiest Steppenwolf was no match for him.The other heroes did really well, the banters were fun. The movie can be termed as a fun and the viewers will have a good time for sure.Looks like Joss Whedon have done a lot of tampering with the Visuals/Scenes which personally I am not happy but it works.Coming back to the scores of the critics, I am still not sure what they are looking for in that movie. I feel the average ratings from them for all comic book movies should be 5 or 6 out of 10. As these flicks are comic book entertainment and not serious drama oriented films. We should exclude The Dark Knight series and Spiderman 2. But overall, we should not expect high scores from them. But to my surprise we see a dis balance between the Marvel and DCEU scores. Not sure the reason but I sincerely feel its not the content. Coming back to the recommendation, you should watch the movie and Judge by yourself. To me the movie is 7/10, I gave 10 in IMDb just to avoid the score mismatch, because I see people intentionally giving bad scores to bring down the overall rating.Verdict: Do watch and Judge by yourself and don't listen to the world!
Justice League is fascinating movie starring superheros from DC world but it was Gal Gadot again who clinched the WOW factor. She is gorgeous and she looks amazing as Wonder Woman. The movie is scripted well but viewers need something good/worthy for all these superheros to go for a war all together.Jason Momoa as Aquaman appears cool and his appearance will go trendsetter styling now, specially Tattoos and the long haired and beard. The performances are average but Batman and Superman characters will be again loved by kids. Cyborg and Flash have played with heart and dedication.The slo-mo combat sequence between Superman versus Cyborg, Flash, Aquaman, Wonder Woman have been cinematographed excellently.The movie is worth a watch in theaters near you. I know it is near to impossible but viewers and fans would love to see "Justice League VS Avengers".
Marvel fans will like it. Thats all I need to say. Disappointed that DC decided to abandon their darker atmosphere to try to appeal to the crowd but I guess you have to make money somehow. The Good: Superman's few scenes are excellent. The Flash, with whom I have never identified, was the best thing about the movie. First time big picture embodiment of Aquaman and Mera is surreal. The Bad: The story-line was average at best. I understand this is just a set up movie which is the only reason I gave it something as high as a 6. The writing and acting were not good. The Ugly: The CGI special effects in comparison to Man of Steel and BVS were incredibly bad to the point where it added a thin layer of cheese similar to that of Wonder Woman. Overall: Huge disappointment.
The movie is an epic come together of some of the most iconic heroes in the DC Universe.Fortunately, the jokes are kept to a minimum and only on occasions that warrant a joke or a punchline. There is no comic relief when the situation is dire on-screen.The heroes are exactly what you expect them to be (for those who know the comics and the characters) and their reactions are true both to their character and the situation that arises around them.It is the first glimpse to the extended universe of DC, which promises to be spectacular.
DC is cleaning up its past mistakes. This is the filmmakers going away from the gritty modern style established in "Man of Steel" and going back to the classic light feel reminiscent of Rich Donner's "Superman" from '78. If you thought "Batman v Superman" was disappointing, then have no fear. Joss Whedon is here to make things more.. hopeful.. Yeah, that would be word. Hopeful, lighthearted and more like the old classic superhero stories. All the bad decisions made in previous movies are now starting to get undone. And that's really good. They should have started out this way, but at least they now know what the right direction is. We owe a lot to "Wonder Woman" for that. Too bad the studio told them to not go over two hours with the run-time. Because that's what ultimately hurt the movie the most. There's a strange rushed feeling throughout it. Lots of new characters are introduced within a short time and before you notice you are already watching the final fight. That's the real issue here. It brushes over things quickly and you don't get much out of it. It's entertaining, but there's no weight or a good enough connection to what's going on. Everything is just decent. But, hey! This is the Justice League! It should be more than just fine... Right? Well, this is what we got. And it could have been way worse. You can watch it and not be too bothered.I liked the characters. They are all performed well. Flash is the one that I think could have been a little stronger. This is an interpretation of him being awkward and an outcast. He had his moments of being somewhat too weird, but I did laugh at most of it. Aquaman didn't get enough time, but I'm fine with the direction they went with. It was fun to see the League interact. At times I forgot about the actors and just saw the comic book heroes instead. And that's a good sign. Still, this movie is messing with me with conflicting thoughts. I liked the characters and many visuals, but the story and overall pacing is rushing instead of being effective. I didn't feel the important impacts of major scenes. I wish I did. By the way, Hans Zimmer is out and Danny Elfman comes back to the genre as a composer. He re-uses his own "Batman" theme from the '89 film as well as using John Williams classic "Superman" score. It's always nice to hear these themes, but it's really distracting. It would have been better with some new original music. The action is fine, but it doesn't get that exciting. It's just watchable with little impact. The best fight is actually the one during the beginning bank heist scene. It never got that good again. In the end I'll say that it isn't bad. It's a decent popcorn movie that for once would have benefited having a longer run-time. Just so that we could feel the importance of the Justice League forming for the first time. The good news are that the future of the DCEU might be in good hands now. We'll see, but I hope so.
It's not the best movie in the DCEU and certainly not the worst but it's worth watching, more like first episode than a movie and has an inspiring message. There were a lot of Easter eggs which fans would probably notice but I'm glad this movie has done "justice" to it's title and I look forward for the upcoming movies. Side Note: Moreover it also showcased the human side of heroes and how they really rise to a challenge. Congrats to Snyder and team :)
The family, me, my wife and my 11-year-old son, went this weekend to see this movie. Both of us, my son and me, are Marvel and DC fans. We didn't enjoy BVS, but we loved Wonder Woman. We read a lot of bad reviews about the movie, so we went to see it with lots of skepticism. The movie didn't disappoint. We didn't feel any moment bored. In fact, it was the first time my son wanted to go to the rest room and it took him about a minute to come back so he wouldn't miss much from the movie. He loved it and we loved it also. A shame with all these bad reviews around DC's movies. They started making it right finally. The only negative is that the movie needed another 20-30 minutes more to introduce the members better and to manage the story line in a better way.
A lot of us comic book fans have waited a very long time to get a JUSTICE LEAGUE movie, and we certainly had high hopes for it after the smashing success of WONDER WOMAN this past summer. Does this movie live up to those high hopes? As usual, the answer is both yes and no; JUSTICE LEAGUE is certainly an improvement on BATMAN V SUPERMAN, but this latest teaming of the Caped Crusader and the Man of Steel, again directed by Zack Snyder, never quite finds the perfect pitch that Patty Jenkins found for WONDER WOMAN. There are no painfully awkward "Martha" moments from Synder's first film, which is a very good thing, but this incarnation of the JL never achieves the easy camaraderie that comes so easy to many of the DC animated movies or Bruce Timm's cartoon series, although it certainly tries very hard and comes close in a number of scenes. One of the joys of a JL film is seeing the interaction between Batman, Wonder Woman, The Flash, Aquaman, Cyborg, and, yes, Superman, yet this seems to be the hardest thing to pull off for a scriptwriter on the page and the actors on the screen.The story picks up where B v S left off as Bruce Wayne/Batman goes about assembling a team to meet the sinister cosmic threat that was hinted at the end of the earlier film. DC already screwed this premise up with SUICIDE SQUAD, and we do have to go through the requisite scenes where Bruce Wayne if initially rebuffed by Aquaman, has the novice Barry Allen jump at the chance to work with the big guys, while Wonder Woman tries to convince a reluctant Cyborg to join up. I give them credit for dispensing with a lot clunky origin exposition scenes and dialog, which keeps the movie down of a very manageable two hour running time (a Warner Bros mandate). But I wouldn't have minded if they jumped into a story where the Justice League was already formed and ready to go; we simply do not need to waste any more time telling back story. By my count, there were at least four well staged action scenes where heroes and villains throw down, including a flashback battle sequence that will bring joy to any DC comic fan, the resurrection of Superman, and the final confrontation in a village in Russia. This is what brings us fans to the theater.For me, the Big Bad, Steppenwolf, is a problem in that he is just another big ugly and angry super powered brute bent on taking over/destroying the Earth for no other real reason than he is just hateful and mean. Steppenwolf, a ten foot tall CGI creation, voiced by the excellent actor, Ciaran Hinds, is almost interchangeable with Ares from WONDER WOMAN, Ronan the Accuser from GUARDIANS OF THE GALAXY, or that other super tall guy from SUICIDE SQUAD. One good thing about Steppenwolf is that he is a brawler, so we are spared another climax where two super beings hurl bolts of energy at each other until one just gives up. I would add this, if you are going to use characters from Jack Kirby's New Gods, go really big and give us Darkseid himself, along with all his minions, don't hold back for a sequel that may never get produced.I think Ben Affleck is the best Bruce Wayne/Batman after Michael Keaton, and Henry Cavil (and his big white teeth) makes for good Superman 聳 at least they let him smile in this one. Gal Gadot is just as impressive here as she was in her stand alone film, in fact, I wish they had given her more to do. Amy Adams and Diane Lane are back as Lois Lane and Martha Kent, along with Jeremy Irons as Alfred. Ray Fisher makes a good impression as Cyborg, even if his character is underdeveloped. The newcomers who make the best impression are Jason Momoa as Arthur Curry/Aquaman, who is properly physically imposing, along with having a great voice, and Ezra Miller as Barry Allen/The Flash. The Flash might be my favorite DC hero, and I wasn't bothered by Miller's unique take on him: playing Barry as a Jewish nerd, at least he gets the best lines in the movie. Seeing J.K. Simmons as Inspector Gordon only made me hope that much more that he will reprise his J. Jonah Jameson in the next Spider-Man movie.JUSTICE LEAGUE has under performed, which means that if the DC movie universe is to continue, there will surely be some changes going forward; Affleck and Cavil could be jettisoned and their parts recast, along with the sacking of Zack Snyder. This is may be because of the lingering animosity from BATMAN V SUPERMAN, which earned the eternal fury of many die-hard fans, so much so, that many of them wanted nothing to do with another film with the same production team and stars. One thing I would suggest Warner Brothers do is hire Joss Whedon, who did extensive re-shoots on the film after Snyder had to abruptly leave (Whedon may be responsible for much of the humor in the film), and bring back Richard Donner, even if he is too old to direct another movie, he should certainly be consulted on the script and production, as his first Superman movie is still the best take on any DC hero and the one that set the mold.There are two post credits scenes, one where two heroes attempt to answer and age old fan question, and another that brings back a previous villain (and his controversial casting), but also has appearance by a universally favorite bad guy. This scene alone, gives me hope that we will see the JL on the screen once again in some form.
The movie is good, and it shows how Americans are influenced by critics... a shameful fact. Please, before criticizing it, see it for yourself.It is worth the ticket. (---SPOILER---- the Superman vs the league scene is amazing)
It must be next-to-impossible to perfectly cast some of the most iconic characters of all time. The big three here are perfectly cast and they have great chemistry. The chemistry between Bruce and Diana, specifically, drives much of the film. Aquaman is not the train wreck that I thought he would be. He takes Arthur in a completely different direction, but it works. Cyborg is way more interesting than he was in the Wolfman/Perez Titans books from the 80s. Flash continues to be portrayed in a way that is different than anything that I've ever read in a DC book but he provides comic relief and is quite entertaining. The film is fast-paced and is just like a comic book come to life. If you love these characters, it will be hard for you not to like this film.
To be clear I did not have high expectations for Justice League. I was thinking it was going to be Batman V Superman but with more characters and plot turns. So worth watching for the action, but little else. But boy was I wrong, it was very good, surprisingly so.Going through the list of things I though would tank it but it did well instead:First they had to introduce three new characters, Aquaman, the Flash, and Cyborg. I though this would drag things down or the characters would end up flat because they could not afford enough time to flesh them out. Neither happened, little time was spent on them but it was time well spent. They showed the characters, they did not just tell us about them. We did not get much backstory but we did get to know them as characters. The actors of all three characters deserved all the money they got and then some.Second I thought it would have a consistent joyless tone through the whole movie. While the start was kind of joyless, it was not near as bad as Batman V Superman. And unlike in Batman V Superman the tone at the start helps the movie. Its a movie about making things better, so starting joyless works (like horror movies starting happy). Things get better as the movie progresses and there are even jokes (good ones even).The third was that the plot would be too complex and would twist too many times (looking at you spiderman 3), and they would leave you in the dust trying to deal with that AND all the new characters. That did not happen partly because they knew their limits and kept the plot simple but workable. The bad guy was not complex, as he is not the point of the movie, he starts the ball rolling but he is not the star. While simple the stakes are shown to be very high, and the bad guys power is never in doubt. While I do hope for a more complex one in the next movie, in this one the focus had to be on the league.One final note is I really like where they are taking Batman. He is old and he shows it, they did not have him take on things that a normal guys should not be able to. The movie as a whole can be seen as him trying to hope, trying to be more like superman. He fails sometimes but he tries, again and again. THAT is a batman I want to see on the big screen.www.JoshuaLawrencePike.com
So glad to see this epic team up.Batman is awesome and did a good job as a leader.Wonder woman is excellent.Flash is lightning quick in actions as well as in acting.Aquaman is aggressive and a bit emotional.Cyborg uses his tech and emotions very well. The script is well written and the film runs at a good pace. Steppenwolf is villainous as he gives a tough fight to the justice league and it will make you feel his presence on screen. Superman is the one who kinda steals the show. Watch it now if you are looking for a an awesome superheroes team up.
I would like a refund at least immediately please. The acting was terrible. They made the flash into a nerdy autistic kid. Batman was barely in it. Superman CGI was awful. Wonder Woman was the only bright spot on a dark movie. Cyborg was decent and his acting was mediocre. Why did the bad guy not have any back story? Why was it the same plot of every marvel movie crammed together featuring the DC Avengers. I would prefer death over re-watching this film.
It's what you would expect from a franchise batting one eh movie to three abortions. Don't go and see this film.I know my reviews are normally longer and more in depth but honestly I'm tired of superhero movies. This one is just as generic in all technical ways. The plot is cookie cutter and the actor's try but I was not invested emotionally in any of them. I go to see these so you don't have to....your welcome.
I think the only word I can use to describe this film is disappointment. The characterization of the existing characters (Superman, Batman and Wonder woman was poor) and the remaining characters were very one dimensional. In my opinion there are two directions a super hero movie can take. First, add in plenty of humour and likable characters like the Marvel movies (particularly Guardians and the recent Thor movie). Alternatively you can make a gritty dark movie like the Dark knight. The Justice League and the DCEA in general fails at both of these things. delivering something that feels dated, lacks any kind of emotional connection or any suspense and horror. The villain in this movie was very poorly constructed and was almost identical to Ares (the villain from Wonder Woman).This brings me on to my final gripe of the movie: Wonder Woman. DC is holding up wonder woman as a feminist icon and yet 1. Why is she not recruiting further women to the team (the female green lantern or black canary would make valuable additions to the team) 2. Why is is that all the men wear suits that make sense to actually protect their bodies and she is still given a skimpy costume that looks like something someone would have come up with the the 70s.So if you want to go see a dated film, watch the Christopher Reed superman because it is a thousand times better than this rubbish.
So, Justice League, first i think i should start by tell my opinions of other DCEU movies, i love Man of Steel and Batman v Superman, i don't like Suicide Squad and i think Wonder Woman is fantastic. Going into Justice League was first of all dream come true, as big fan of characters and what they stand for. Just imagine this movie 57 years in the making since first Justice League appearance. Yeah, yeah but what about quality of the film, be honest it's a mixed bag even i enjoyed a lot, so let's start with goods. I love characters and every actor did a good job, stand out for me was Superman, in preparation for this movie a watched every Superman movie since 1978 and see character done so right was awesome. Flash was great comic relief and Ezra Miller bring his own to the role very well. Wonder Woman, Batman, Aquaman and even Cyborg who i tough by trailers will be a weak link, they all was best part of the movie. I love a lot of moments and scenes from film, for example opening Batman scene, Aquaman going to the Atlantis with Icky Thump playing, return of Superman, Danny Elfman soundtrack, final shots of the film, they all was amazing and bring my score so high and tear to my eye. Unfortunate movie has problems, villain, some plot elements, final battle location where you don't care and don't feel stakes. It's all there, but for me so many good stuff for sure beats not so good. For overall this is the Justice League and now road to the future look really good and full of potential, even movie not was perfect, so many positive stuff in there, that i don't even mention deserve a praise. I would love to write and talk about this a lot more and this movie for sure deserve a examine and would love to be just fly on set on this thing. To get to the end i really, really like film and hope you can enjoyed as well, movie is fun, exciting and special, come on, what other time you will be seeing Superman 1978, Batman 1989, Dark Knight, Man of Steel, Batman v Superman, first JUSTICE LEAGUE on big screen of your favorite movie theater. So go out there and have good time. By the way can't wait for ultimate edition of this movie. Thank you for reading review, what year we have for comic book movies Logan, Lego Batman, Guardians, Spider- Man, Thor, Wonder Woman and Justice League, what a time to be alive! :)
the movie is fun to watch, I am a DC fan, I have to admit it so I have watched this movie about 5 times to fully get all the stuff this movie offered. Differently, from the edgy tone of Suicide Squad or Batman vs Superman, this movie is just like a real-life version of the old justice league animated series. The movie has its moment, maybe too long with too much detail just in case for newcomers, and I am OK with that. What I'm trying to say is, don't expect an Oscar worthy movie or a deeply underrated masterpiece like Watchmen, the movie is fun to watch, it has its tone, one of the closest live action of the old justice league animated series. 9/10 because there is no green lantern, there cant be any justice league without Hal Jordan or John Steward
justice league had every chance to improve and make a good film at this point people seem to have such little faith in the film some came out of it surprised and said it was pretty good now before i get into this film one thing you should know about me is that i'm not a causal movie fan i consider myself a critic and a tough one at that i see some things most causal audiences don't see but just because i am like that doesn't mean my criticism of the film is invaded. i went into this film with a fresh mind i had no expectations what so ever people would tell me that it was fun and pretty good but going out off it i was really disappointed with the film the acting felt really wooden it seemed like everyone had a miserable time and it shows in the performances the plot of the film is non existent through out the film i couldn't understand or follow what would happen and in this film no one changed and no one grow as a person in the film and the main villain just reminded me of a forgettable marvel villain the tone felt really off too i guess with the response of batman v superman the studio panic ad turned it into this a happy goofy tone which doesn't work for dc what the studio failed to understand was the reason batman v superman failed because off the fact that the reason of conflict was stupid dc do make great dark story's but this film felt like it was just trying to rip off marvel another thing i dislike is the fact that in the film characters will have information that they should not know what so ever which makes the film all the more aggressively bad also the one another thing i noticed was that in this universe they are all supposed to feel connected but this film feels like it belongs somewhere else but not the DCEU the only thing i kind of liked was the flash i mean he does have some bad dialog but i feel if the writers had fixed some of the mistakes they made with him he would have worked a lot better but as is he is the only character i kind of cared for but that's all i can say that is good about this film. i will end with this there were some sources saying the first cut was unwatchable and if this film is a awful mess i can't imagine what the first cut of this film is like it was a shame how bad justice league was i genuinely hoped this film would be fun but it wasn't at all i guess you could say for me this film is the death of the superhero genre for me it represents everything wrong with the genre as a whole because the more i notice the more i see the superhero genre being boring predictable products but that's just my thoughts on justice league if you think this rating is unfair and you enjoy this film all i have to say is enjoy it all you want after all it's just my review of justice league
2017's Justice League is another entry in DC's desperate and rushed attempt at wrestling the superhero film genre back from Marvel. Instead of working to uniquely match the set design of Thor Ragnarok, drama of Logan, and the chemistry and combat sequences of The Avengers, Snyder &amp; co have essentially created another Marvel ripoff. Apart from the performances of Gadot, Miller, and Fisher, the film is a slog to get through, filling scenes with nauseating action sequences and forced character chemistry. The main antagonist, Steppenwolf, is a bland ripoff from the Avengers, and the "driving force" in the movie, the "Mother Boxes" feel like a poorly motivated off-shot of the Infinity Stones.I'm not a Marvel or DC fanboy, I'm just trying to talk about this film as a film. The superhero genre is more saturated than ever, and you have plenty of better options than this.
I honestly don't understand some of the fan reviews I've been reading about this film... It's as though we've been watching very different movies.I went in to Justice League with an open mind, having had problems with Snyder's previous films (though not hating them) and having loved Wonder Woman. I have to say that despite my best efforts to see past small problems, I found it very difficult to like this movie. I am a fan of primarily the DC trinity. Have been for at least 15 years, and I know that would lead people to think that my problems are likely an objection to the changes from the source material. Let me assure you, they are not. This movie is, at times, disjointed and aloof. It leaves too many things unexplained; so much so that it becomes distracting. Furthermore, it is completely riddled with CGI. There's even evidence of CG in scenes that I wouldn't think require much CG. Most of the worst CG are found in scenes with the villain or Superman.Let me clarify, there are redeemable qualities in this movie. Almost every time Wonder Woman is on screen, she makes the movie better. I still don't take issue with Ben Affleck's portrayal of Batman/Bruce Wayne (his motivations and decisions are another matter). I found Cyborg surprisingly compelling. There are a few funny jokes (but also a few truly terrible ones). I was actually excited by some of the backstory and Easter eggs in the movie (the flashback was a highlight for me). And I can really appreciate what they were going for here, but the execution was so problematic.I hated how the amazons were treated in this movie and how they went from wearing roman-style armour in the previous (female directed) film, to stylized bikini-clad warriors in this (male directed) movie. 2 steps forward, one step back I guess.I mostly hated the dialogue and the unanswered questions. The dialogue, like most Zack Snyder movies is so unnatural and ridiculous, not even Joss' snappy word play could save it. At one point Superman says "but I also believe in Justice" and I rolled my eyes so hard I thought I would pass out. The villain is never properly explained. Like, how did he get here? How does he have access to his minions? What is his larger plan? I know that it all ties to a larger villain, but it's not explained to the audience. The casts' abilities and power levels are all over the place and the new recruits are given no explanation as to how or why they would suddenly be capable to do battle on the level of the DC trinity (who have trained in combat).I could go on, but there's no point. It will do well. It's the first time we've seen some of these characters, so we'll get more of this and the criticisms won't ultimately matter. But DC could learn a lot from Marvel. It's worth taking your time to build up a cohesive narrative rather than trying to play catch-up. I'd recommend waiting to see it rather than spending $20 to see it in a theatre. Save your money for Thor Ragnarok.
Was Justice League everything I was hoping for? Nope! There are some things I would've wanted done differently, but I could say that about a lot of movies, so I am trying to judge this by the content we got and not the content I wanted. So I gave it 8 stars, and that seems pretty high considering all the hate the movie is getting. It definitely doesn't deserve higher in my opinion, but I don't really see it deserving less than a 5 either. My favorite thing about this movie was the cast, by far. Henry Cavill and Gal Gadot are fantastic. Ben Affleck is really good too. I've always been kind of on the edge with his portrayal of Batman. It is not always my cup of tea, but I enjoyed him in this movie. Ray Fisher did okay as Cyborg. I'll expand on my opinion of Cyborg later in the review. Jason Momoa as Aquaman was interesting (he will also come up again later in the review). And lastly Ezra Miller was fine as the Flash. I did have a hard time adjusting to Miller's version of the Flash, as I am a very bug fan of Grant Gustin's version in the CW TV show. That being said, he did a good job! It just took some adjusting since his character seems particularly socially awkward compared to Gustin's portrayal which seems very extroverted by comparison. So Miller did not do bad at all, and I did like it! So for anyone who hasn't guessed, I have severely limited comic knowledge. My full knowledge is based on the CW shows (which I understand is not a good source for comic relevance) and some of the post-New 52 Batman comics. As such, I know basically nothing about Aquaman or Cyborg coming into this movie. I know that Aquaman is from Atlantis and that he can survive underwater, and that is the extent of my knowledge. Cyborg...I have absolutely no knowledge of ahead of time, aside from his appearance in the original Teen Titans animated series. Characters such as Batman, Superman, and Wonder Woman are easy to follow because (for the men at least) their stories are iconic, and everyone has some inkling of an idea of who they are, what happened to them, and what they can do (and for Wonder Woman, her standalone movie obviously does a fantastic job informing everyone of her story). I felt the same with the Flash, since I have knowledge from the CW show, which seems to share a vaguely similar origin story with the version seen in the movie. This leaves us with Aquaman and Cyborg as our outliers. I enjoyed their portrayals, and I was interested in their characters, but I had no real attachment to either of them. That is one of my biggest complaints. As much as the public seems to be against superhero origin movies anymore, I feel like these two deserved to have one. Their histories are not widely known by people who are not faithful comic readers, and as such, some more information regarding them would have been nice going into this movie. Just something extra so that I have more reason to care about what happens to them.My other main gripe with Justice League is the main villain. And lets be clear, I actually liked Steppenwolf as the villain, I found him kind of interesting overall. However, he was, overall, forgettable. He did not receive enough screen time for me to really get to understand or care about his motivations. I feel like the best kind of villain is one that is either coherent enough that I understand why they are doing what they are doing (maybe I'm even rooting for them in a way), or crazy enough that they are frightening and need to be taken down. Steppenwolf wasn't crazy really, nor did I really follow his plan too well. But he was kind of scary, so I was alright with him overall. What I did not like was his disposable army. But, I feel anyone who complains about it in this movie and not in Marvel's The Avengers is hypocritical. Both movies have the same fault that there is this army helping the main villain, yet they are not helpful to him in the least, and our heroes pretty much don't even really struggle against them. This is something that many movies like this do, so I'm trying not to be too harsh on it. The CGI isn't top notch either, but it did end up being better than I expected.All things considered - this movie is fun. For the most part, the jokes land well, the characters are interesting, and the story is still enjoyable. Aside from one or two odd lines of dialogue and two extremely goofy Batman reactions to something happening, I think the movie was great. It had a decent plot and a fun cast. It wasn't perfect, but it set up the future of DC movies pretty well, and I left the theatre pleasantly surprised. I don't mean to compare it to Marvel, as it is indeed different, but I'd say it was *at least* as good Avengers: Age of Ultron. Probably a little better. So, in that comparison: there was a lot that could be improved, but in no way would I ever say this movie was bad. It was good, and even though it didn't completely blow me away, I still feel comfortable saying that I 100% recommend it, because it was still fun, different, and a positive direction for the DCEU.
Just recently saw Justice League today and I have to say, as someone who took awhile to watch it and has been anticipating it for sometime, I have to say WOW what a film. The film was excellent from start to finish, people who say this film was bad or this film was not good are really acting like they're a film critic. Its a FICTION film people!! not to be taken so seriously. The character development was great for each character which they don't want to so too much because they have their own films in development in their own right. As a comic book nerd and fanboy I can tell I can die happy now because it was everything that I wanted to Justice League. Barry Allen stole the show, Aquaman was awesome, I liked how they went more into Batman's story, Superman was brief but great to have him back, Cyborg was really my favorite among everyone. Don't know why but liked his character development the most. An cant forget about Diana aka Wonder Woman who is beautiful and strong as usual. Something about that woman. Cant wait what DCEU has in store oh and stay for the wtf after credits scene.
Like catching malaria after you have survived ebola, Justice League has the DC Universe trending upward.It is a Frankenstein of a film, obviously a bigger film lurks behind but it has been stitched together by Joss Whedon in post production, so we get some lighter touches but I think we all know who shot the 6 scenes where the camera is trained on Gal Gadot's butt. In 2017. In Hollywood...in the same year that Patty Jenkin's directed the exact same goddamn protagonist...it is beyond imagining.Steppenwolf is the CGI villain. He is the worst superhero villain in a few decades. All the CGI is horrible. This film had a budget of 300 MILLION...The cast are not bad and I give them a break looking at the screenplay and direction. Ezra Miller is good as The Flash and Jason Momoa at least brings a different energy to the crew of heroes. The rest look like they are trying to survive a death march. The exception is Amy Adams, pay her everything to keep being Lois Lane.This is just insulting but like a 7 year old playing the flute, I have given one extra star for trying.
I really tried. I really, really tried. Reaching an expectation is like chasing a moving car. If you don't know who you're chasing, you don't know where they're going, why they're going. There is an impossibility to reaching expectations; I struggle with this reality going into every major blockbuster. "Temper your expectations." "You want every movie to succeed." Never have I wanted a movie to fail. A failing movie means we don't get more of the art, and getting someone to pay and adapt beautiful art is reason enough to keep making art. Justice League is not art.I once read this article about how Geoff Johns and Zack Snyder have different visions of DC, because of Watchmen. Johns deplores the bleak world Alan Moore created. Snyder made a romance of it. You would imagine they'd have differing views of Superman. Justice League begins with found footage of kids interviewing Superman about what he thinks a hero is. I should have known what I was in store for as the first shot of Superman we get is one of his lower-face comically CGI'd to remove the mustache Henry Cavill grew for MI6. It's so obvious. The skin tone in his upper face doesn't match the lower one, and it just looks bad in all respects. The entire movie attempts to glorify Superman's accomplishments and what he stood for without offering any substance of what he actually stands for. There's no sense that the loss of Superman really turns the world upside down until the Motherboxes are awoken and scream for Steppenwolf, of whom, I guess, was just waiting around somewhere for thousands of years until Superman died, of whom only came to Earth a few decades prior. But, whatever, "don't focus on the plot issues."You don't get a sense, outside of Wonder Woman -- and we only know her because Patty Jenkins gave us a hopeful introduction earlier this year -- that any of these heroes embody what Superman stands for. You don't get a sense that they even know what he stood for. But that is a clear thread Snyder and whoever made this wants you to explore. They did a "Death of Superman" story without allowing us to really know Superman and to know everyone important and Superman impacted them and/or the world. They just tell you "hey, Superman is a beacon, and you should look at him like one." 'Show, don't tell.'The Batman BvS introduces us to is broody, rich. You can tell that his infamous trauma very much drives his life's work, his decision making. The Justice League Batman is a neutered icon. His only endearing quality to the team is he's "rich." Aside from Batman's guilt at causing Superman's death, you can't point to me a line of dialogue that says Batman believes anything he's doing in this movie is for the 'right thing.' "Stopping Steppenwolf and his invading army to save the world is the 'right thing.'" Okay.The first time Batman meets a Parademon, he struggles in the fight. Is there even one time Batman wrecks a Parademon with his elite hand-to-hand combat moves? Every scene the League fights together in Batman requires the use of his toys, especially the big toys. I can understand that Batman is not superhuman, but in every fight scene he felt utterly useless compared to everyone else. If you've read a Justice League comic, you know Batman is exceptionally intelligent and that intellect allows Batman to truly stand alongside everyone else. You don't get a sense of that in this movie, it's probably all the times Batman says "uh oh." Let's not even forget how much he pines for Superman and especially his assistance during the latter fight scenes. This is the same guy that just tried to kill Superman in the last movie? Give me Scott Snyder's Batman, Tom King's Batman. One time, please!If Justice League was the pilot for a show on HBO (it wouldn't be on HBO because HBO wouldn't waste so much money putting garbage out there), it would be fine. I would probably finish the season and leave it at that. Unfortunately, it was a major studio production that had me sitting there waiting for the post-credits stinger thinking 'maybe it's just impossible to make something good, coherent, cohesive with these characters.'
I just watched Justice League at the movies and it was great. This movie was funny with the flash, aqua man, batman, wonder woman and cyborg. i don't want to give spoilers so you must go watch this dc movie. Its not to serious and great to watch. its not bad like everyone said its really good so go check it out for your self.
Whether or not you feel like arguing for DC or Marvel, a good movie is a good movie, regardless of who made it. The terms 'fun' and 'dark' are the two that get tossed around the most when comparing these two franchises, and while many people are wrong to like a movie based on its tone, I can gladly say that not much complaining can be done about the tone of Justice League. Meshing light and dark to form a solid mixture of the two, due to some unfortunate circumstances behind the scenes, may have actually made this a better film than it originally was, but who really knows. As I said, the tone of this film is great in my opinion, but the movie itself is quite the mixed bag. There is a lot of fun to be had with Justice League, but here is a weighing of the pros and cons of this highly anticipated addition to the DC Universe of films.The premise is quite simple. An evil force in Steppenwolf has arrived and needs to find three so-called mother boxes in order to take over the world. Using what little backstory that Bruce Wayne has on many super-powered people, he, along with the help of Diana, form a team to take him down. With the hope that Superman may also return, this team must do everything they can to hopefully save the day. Although these characters are all a joy to see interacting with each other, herein lies the biggest issues with the film as a whole.There isn't much to say about the villain here because his storyline is almost too simple to even want to describe. He's a generic bad guy that wants to take over the world, who really only exists in order to make this team feel the need to band together and save the world. When a villain is just a tool for a team to exist, the overall impact of your movie won't ever reach a high point. That being said, even though the villain ruins the entire film for me every time he's on-screen, the characters surrounding him and how they all come together was really the highlight of the movie, making the price of admission worth it.No, characters like Cyborg, Aquaman, and The Flash aren't given quite enough backstory to really feel for them, but the casting of them is terrific and the little screen time they're given is fantastic. Their interaction with one another was great and I can't wait to see more of them in the future. There's honestly nowhere to go but up from this messy installation.Ben Affleck and Gal Gadot once again bring everything they have to the table and they sure seem to be making these characters their own, so I really hope they stick with this franchise for at least a few more years, because I feel as though there are some entertaining stories to be told if the post-credits sequences have anything to say about it.Many people will be going into this film hoping for some exciting Superman action, and although I won't give anything away for fans, I'll simply state that his small presence is more than worth the wait. Like in Man of Steel, his character, along with Lois Lane and his mother Martha definitely adds some great emotion to certain elements of the film. In terms of entertainment, this movie held my interest from start to finish and I'm actually looking forward to seeing the future progression of these characters after these first rocky few films. I like these characters a lot. They just deserve better films.In the end, comic book fans will have their share of shrieks throughout the film, from cameos to world-building, but it really just comes down to whether or not this is a good movie for the majority of audiences to flock out and see. Upon reflection, I enjoyed much more about this film than I disliked, so I would warrant a recommendation, but only to those who've followed each installment since Man of Steel, because not knowing who certain characters are would be a detriment to your experience.The movie feels very rushed, but there are great character moments to make up for that. Even though there is some very obvious CGI work throughout the film, the action is exciting and a joy to see on the big screen. Even though the villain is terrible, the team is a blast to see interacting on-screen. I seem to be finding a pro for every con, but it just comes down to whether or not I had a good time, and that's a pretty definitive yes. Justice League is a mess, but it's a mess I had fun with and that shows promise for the future. I enjoyed myself for the most part.
Okay, first of all. I wasn't gonna see it in cinemas, I wanted to wait until it comes out online. But all those trailer, and the "hype" had me going. Turns out, it was very big disappointment. I don't know how to even start. If they want to make a movie, let it go how comics say. Because of their only hit "Wonder Woman", they made her the wisest, strongest, dominant character ever. It felt like more Wonder woman ft justice league than Justice league. It felt like Batman, superman and all other characters were there at the mercy of wonder woman. The way batman acts, superman acts (in comics), over here, it was all just about wonder woman. I know wonder woman is inspiring this and that, but they over did it here. I can't even take it out from my mind how bad it felt I don't think so we are ever gonna see bad-ass batman EVERY AGAIN. It's all about wonder woman now. Secondly, CGI wasn't gonna enough. Story was very predictable, nothing special, no surprises. And the Superman, wasn't exciting, somehow you already know what was gonna happen. It all just felt awful, I wanted to see bad-ass "batman", meaning of hope "Superman", the king aqua man, inspiring wonder woman etc. But this is more like, we beg you wonder woman for your mercy, please guide us, we are nothing without you, all that crap. I'm not hating on wonder woman (comics), but this is really awful. See there are many plot holes, but it would have been exciting if they did like comics, instead making it all about wonder woman because she had such a hit in DCEU. Gal Gadot is to DC like RDJ to Marvel. Just the difference is RDJ helps all other actors in MCU to rise with him, Gal Gadot makes it all about her, her and HER. After watching this, I even started hating "Wonder Woman" movie. Sorry DC
I have been waiting for this movie for a while now but it really let me down. The villain is the biggest problem here. His CGI is not good and he appears like a cartoon.The attempted humour was way too Cheesy to be honest. It hardly lands. The only positive are the characters and their dynamics with one another. I mean I could go on and on but don't like too waste too much on this.
I'm marking this as "contains spoilers" although I will do my best to keep spoilers to a minimum. Any legitimate spoilers contained in this review will be in service of explaining why Justice League is a ham-fisted, stupid mess of a film. Please enjoy.So it's not a spoiler to reveal that Batman assembles a team, but the reason that he does so is so insultingly stupid that it really ruins everything that happens afterwards. Batman needs to assemble a superhero team because a big evil force is coming to destroy Earth. How does Batman find out about this threat? Because he kills a bug man and the bug man's guts leave behind a mysterious symbol that Batman conveniently recognizes as a symbol rather than just coincidence. The reason that this happens can only be described as "Because Movie". There is NO REASON why this would happen besides the fact that the writers needed a way for Batman to discover the impending threat and that's the best they could come up with. They needed Batman to discover the threat early and begin assembling the team. Because Movie. On a related note he begins assembling the Justice League having absolutely no idea who or what he's up against and having no idea whether a team would be necessary or helpful in combating the threat. Keeping in mind that his first experience with another superhero was being distrustful and trying to kill him, assembling a team seems particularly out of character as a first resort to combat an unknown threat. It's almost like the only reason he began assembling the Justice League is because the movie is called Justice League. Because Movie. It sounds like I'm really harping on this, but it's indicative of the thought process of the filmmakers. They got to the first hurdles in the plot and said "screw it, nobody will ask questions if we cut corners right?". So keep in mind that the ENTIRE REASON that the Justice League was assembled and exists in the first place is the result of ridiculous plot convenience. It's not even like it's the only time they do this either. Later in the film, for the sake of plot convenience, the writers basically have the villain steal something from the Justice League while they aren't paying attention even though there's no way he could've known where they were, that they had the thing he wanted, or that that particular moment would be a good opportunity to steal what he needed. The villain has to collect these items and seems to have the ability to teleport to wherever these items are (like within arms length of them). It is never adequately explained that or how or why he is able to this. Also even though he has no problem doing it for the first two items for some reason he is completely incapable of doing it for the last one until it is conveniently left unguarded. Once it's unguarded he has no problem teleporting to it and stealing it which he should have been able to do before the Justice League even took possession of the item. Because Movie. On a more general note this film is approximately 5% less dark and miserable and stupid than Zack Snyder's other DCEU films so hats off to Joss Whedon for his input. That being said there's still nothing fun or charming about any of the characters or about the style of the film itself. There's only so many different ways to say that it just wasn't fun. It wasn't an enjoyable experience in any way. I left the screening having felt nothing, learned nothing, and grown in no way with the characters. Nobody has an arc or learns a lesson or is bettered in any way as a result of the events of the film. This lack of style and story is particularly glaring keeping in mind the close release proximity to Thor Ragnarok which oozes style and charm from every pore and actually takes the viewers on a journey of self-discovery with characters that we know and love. Everything about Justice League felt like it was done out of contractual obligation rather than love of and desire to add to the source material.
If you love comic books and you are ready to see a superhero movie then this movie is what you need to see. Some people may see that this movie is not as good as marvels but let me tell you something, yes the DC universe is darker than marvels personally I do not understand how that is a bad thing, in my opinion, both marvel and DC movies are worth watching and are unique
Every heroe has their own personality, and the team is made with logical thinking, so you see that the history is easy to understand, but that's great becomes everyone can understand every scene without get confused...... so really nice, THE MOVIE WAS FUNNY, BUT SERIOUSLY AND WITHOUT LOSE DRAMA.... COOL
It's been just 20 minutes since I left the movie theater and I'm still trembling in happiness. First of all I'm a die hard Superman fan. What an awesome movie it was! I was expecting the return of Superman but I wasn't expecting this. I of course read some theories around how he will return and on who's side he will fight. This outcome pretty much covers it all. I almost left in tears when Suprman engages Steppenwolf and I was shocked how well crafted that moment with classical Superman theme. Overall the story is very good. The movie and the characters have good sense of humor. You feel like you get to know the characters more and discover their new sides. New additions to the team Aquaman, Flash and Cyborg have a very good introduction before their own movies coming up. Characters like Batman, Superman and Wonderwoman prove that they have much to offer in upcoming years. Just like Marvel Universe and Avengers I think we will get to see more team ups even in solo movies in the future. This is first in line and with more movies of other DC characters I think there will be more addition to the Justice League in the future. At the very of end of the movie Bruce Wayne and Diana pretty much have a conversation around the same topic. There of course some weaknesses but I can't wait to see the longer Blye Ray version of this movie. I'm very satisfied overall and I will watch this movie again.
Less Mars hunter or Green Lantern and Green Arrow and other members of the classic Justice League, plus Superman guest with Flash and Batman is not the same actor (from the cast conversion) deduction. . . . Lead to plot scattered, poor picture. . But better than "Batman and Superman: dawn reproduction", but worse than "Wonder Woman." . . Can only look forward to a different presentation and egg. . . Come on. . . Looking forward to all DC heroes at the same time ...
Hey, Justice League is better than Batman v Superman: Dawn of Justice, if for no other reason than it's a full half-hour shorter. Those, my friends, are 30 extra minutes you get to spend doing something else, anything else, instead of watching another DC UNIVERSE snoozefest.With such star power as Henry Cavill, Ben Affleck, Ezra Miller, Ray Fisher, Jason Momoa, Gal Gadot, and national treasure Amy Adams, no wonder they could not afford to pay Ciar谩n Hinds to actually appear in the movie as the big bad baddie, Steppenwolf. That's right, folks, it's your favorite and most popular DC villain ever, Steppenwolf in full CGI gloritude.What's that you say? You've never heard of Steppenwolf? Well, he's been hiding for thousands of years but can appear anywhere using a blue cylinder dealie thing and he has a legion of scary flying zombie things that are actually pretty easy to kill. Steppenwolf, however, is really strong, and he has a wicked-cool fiery axe up with which he chops stuff and he's sorta angry all the time and never really shuts up. Oh, and apparently the last time he tried to destroy Earth everyone got together and teamed up to defeat him so that seems like a really good idea again, but it's going to be really tough to get superheroes to band together because they all lead such complicated and interesting lives.Steppenwolf is really powerful, but he can become, like, really super-duper powerful if he can get three Mother Boxes (that's right, I said "Mother Boxes") together, much like Mola Ram hunting for three Sankara stones, or was it heavy water, red crystals, and meteor dust? Good thing we only have to find three of them, because finding six of them would take too long. Also of note is you can revive Superman with one of them, which is pretty cool, because he can probably punch Steppenwolf's head clean off all by himself.Nice also we have no real back story for any of the newbies. Yes, Flash is a goofy dork who gets to have the most fun, but pretty much everyone else, especially Ben Affleck and Henry Cavill, look like they've been sprayed with stupid dust and inhaled it for a few hours. Also, Cyborg is sort of like a nicer Lawnmower Man, I think. Gonna have to check the press guide on that one.Oh, no Jared Leto?! Perhaps too busy planning his next hairstyle.Oh, and hi to Jeremy Irons, J.K. Simmons, and Diane Lane! See you next time!
I love the dark and dramatic atmosphere of the DC Cinematic Universe and I loved the atmosphere that Snyder created before retiring. I also admit that the movie was entertaining enough.HOWEVER! The characterisation of most of the characters is just so wrong. First, Batman doesn't let the criminals go, I hope this is clear. Second, The Flash doesn't make retarded jokes, he is someone who believes in the cause and takes his job seriously. I hope he will be developed better in the next movies. Third, who's Aquaman? Cause after I left the screening, about his character, I knew as much as I knew before the movie. Fortunately, Wonder Woman is so hot that I can't really complain about her and Cyborg is actually the only one that I can save out of all of them. I really don't wanna say anything about Steppenwolf cause the para-demons are characterised more than him, in this movie. A few editing mistakes. Gigantic plot holes like the flowers that appear from nowhere towards the end of the picture and the 3/4 scenes dedicated to a completely useless Russian family who have the same function of Commissioner Gordon in this movie: No function at all. Justice League left me with no words at all, but luckily, I had zero expectations.
I might have given this movie 7 or 8 out of 10 but it starts off with political nonsense. Two white guys attacking a Muslim shop owner with the very next scene being a bunch of white guy terrorists blowing up a building. More talk later on global warming and other liberal politics. The facts are that Muslims terrorists are the vast majority of people who are committing terrorists acts worldwide. This is undisputed. When was the last time you heard about a group of white terrorists going into an American building to blow it up? These are undisputed facts in the last 20-30 years.Note to Hollywood, if you inject your politics into a screenplay you will turn off around 50% of your audience, so it is no wonder this movie is not making the money it should. Leave the politics out and focus on telling a story devoid of your political agenda and people will be much happier.
SPOILER!!!!!Aquaman, a fish wrestler out of the water. Cyborg, the NBA player with metal in half of his body. Batman, a bat suit with some skills but weaker than ever. Superman the boss that appears 5 minutes, and wonder woman the hot girl. This is justice league. Oh, and Flash is copy paste of spider man but it looks like crap (in terms of personality). 300 millions invested it seems very nice!... NOT!
I am a hardcore DC fan, and getting sick of the way Marvel makes their movie with the same formula years to years. Seeing the trailer of JL, I thought there'd finally be a hope. I was terribly wrong! This movie felt like a 2 hours trailer. The only thing it has ever created was a chaotic world where Earthlings questionably divided into 3 'clans' and know nothing about each other's existence (which ridiculously leads Steppenwolf into this world !?), then throw a bunch of individual-with-super-power- but-have-no-awareness-of-keeping-their-secret-identity, running (and riding, and flying, and blah... blah... blah...) with zero idea why, from beginning til the end. Batman has been awfully downgraded into a flaw copycat of Tony Stark, but mentally weaker. Flash was fast, but tried too much to be Spider-man, even though his joke was not that funny. Cyborg was Hulk-with-iron-skin, always questioning his existence and think-out- loud that his gift is nothing but an abomination. Wonder Woman was sadly 'Captain DC', who usually gives lectures (with her own case as reference) to other members, and calls them 'babies' in the end. They are basically the trying-to-be-cool-rich-guy, the young and impulsive (quite literally), the whinny, and the pretty face who always pretend that it is not her biggest advantage. Sounds familiar now? Aquaman is a surprisingly good character, but could not save the whole movie. The plot is super simple, clich茅 and predictable. Attempt for spoiling this movie is unnecessary since there is no plot twist, no unexpected detail to actually make a surprise turn. We all knew Superman would return. If you wanna ruin your best friend's experience before he watch JL, I am sorry but it'll be your only card. After all, in Batman V Superman they literally killed Superman. In JL, the killed the Batman. Please, do yourselves a favor and don't go to the cinema for this. Just wait for the DVD version.
